5210 | retreat (verb): to move back or away from something | loc: ustoupit
  EN TS: One "scary" goose made them retreat.
  cz TS: Jedna „děsivá" husa je donutila ustoupit.
  EN FS: One "scary" dog made them retreat.
  cz FS: Jeden „děsivý" pes je donutil ustoupit.
  EN TP: retreating from a goose
  cz TP: ustupovat před husou
  EN FP: retreating from the rain
  cz FP: ustupovat před deštěm
5211 | return (noun): a coming home again after time away | loc: návrat
  EN TS: What a happy return home!
  cz TS: Jaký šťastný návrat domů!
  EN FS: What a sad return home!
  cz FS: Jaký smutný návrat domů!
  EN TP: a happy return home
  cz TP: šťastný návrat domů
  EN FP: a return to school
  cz FP: návrat do školy
5212 | station (noun): a place with special equipment for one purpose | loc: nádraží
  EN TS: Big hugs at the station!
  cz TS: Velké objímání na nádraží!
  EN FS: Big hugs at the airport!
  cz FS: Velké objímání na letišti!
  EN TP: hugging at the station
  cz TP: objímání na nádraží
  EN FP: a radio station
  cz FP: rozhlasová stanice
5213 | railway (noun): the line that runs trains for passengers | loc: železnice
  EN TS: A red train is on the railway.
  cz TS: Na železnici stojí červený vlak.
  EN FS: A red tram is on the railway.
  cz FS: Na železnici stojí červená tramvaj.
  EN TP: a railway station platform
  cz TP: nástupiště železniční stanice
  EN FP: a railway in the mountains
  cz FP: železnice v horách
5214 | desert (noun): a huge dry area of sand where little grows | loc: poušť
  EN TS: Bike, scooter, then desert!
  cz TS: Kolo, koloběžka, pak poušť!
  EN FS: Bike, scooter, then jungle!
  cz FS: Kolo, koloběžka, pak džungle!
  EN TP: a camel in the desert
  cz TP: velbloud v poušti
  EN FP: a camel in a zoo
  cz FP: velbloud v zoo
5215 | cycling (noun): the sport of travelling on a bicycle | loc: cyklistika
  EN TS: She is cycling by a fjord.
  cz TS: Cyklistika u fjordu: ona to dává.
  EN FS: She is cycling in a city.
  cz FS: Cyklistika ve městě: ona to dává.
  EN TP: cycling by the fjord
  cz TP: cyklistika u fjordu
  EN FP: cycling in the city
  cz FP: cyklistika ve městě
5216 | stroll (noun): a slow, relaxed walk for pleasure | loc: procházka
  EN TS: She is taking a slow stroll.
  cz TS: Jde na pomalou procházku.
  EN FS: She is taking a slow swim.
  cz FS: Jde si pomalu zaplavat.
  EN TP: a stroll past flower stalls
  cz TP: procházka kolem stánků s květinami
  EN FP: a stroll along the beach
  cz FP: procházka po pláži
5217 | vest (noun): clothing without sleeves worn over a shirt | loc: vesta
  EN TS: He has a yellow vest on.
  cz TS: Má na sobě žlutou vestu.
  EN FS: He has an orange vest on.
  cz FS: Má na sobě oranžovou vestu.
  EN TP: a yellow safety vest
  cz TP: žlutá reflexní vesta
  EN FP: a vest under a shirt
  cz FP: vesta pod košilí
5218 | room (noun): a space inside a building with walls and a floor | loc: pokoj
  EN TS: She is checking every room.
  cz TS: Kontroluje každý pokoj.
  EN FS: She is cleaning every room.
  cz FS: Uklízí každý pokoj.
  EN TP: a room with arched windows
  cz TP: pokoj s klenutými okny
  EN FP: a room with a fireplace
  cz FP: pokoj s krbem
5219 | roommate (noun): a person who shares a room with you | loc: spolubydlící
  EN TS: The roommates made pasta. Yum.
  cz TS: Spolubydlící udělali těstoviny. Mňam.
  EN FS: The roommates made pizza. Yum.
  cz FS: Spolubydlící udělali pizzu. Mňam.
  EN TP: two roommates sharing a flat
  cz TP: dva spolubydlící v bytě
  EN FP: two roommates moving out
  cz FP: dva spolubydlící se stěhují
5220 | clip (verb): to remove something by snipping it off | loc: odstřihnout
  EN TS: Someone is clipping the rose.
  cz TS: Někdo odstřihává růži.
  EN FS: Someone is watering the rose.
  cz FS: Někdo zalévá růži.
  EN TP: clipping a rose stem
  cz TP: odstřihnout stonek růže
  EN FP: clipping a dog's nails
  cz FP: stříhat psovi drápky
5221 | wind (verb): to move in a curving, twisting course | loc: vinout se | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The path winds up the hills.
  cz TS: Cesta se vine do kopců.
  EN FS: The river winds up the hills.
  cz FS: Řeka se vine do kopců.
  EN TP: a path winding up mountains
  cz TP: cesta vinoucí se horami
  EN FP: a river winding downhill
  cz FP: řeka vinoucí se z kopce
5222 | steps (noun): a flight of stairs you walk up or down | loc: schody
  EN TS: She is climbing stone steps.
  cz TS: Stoupá po kamenných schodech.
  EN FS: She is climbing wooden steps.
  cz FS: Stoupá po dřevěných schodech.
  EN TP: stone steps up a mountain
  cz TP: kamenné schody do hor
  EN FP: stone steps to a beach
  cz FP: kamenné schody k pláži
5223 | route (noun): the way you follow to get somewhere | loc: trasa
  EN TS: Her route is marked in red.
  cz TS: Její trasa je vyznačená červeně.
  EN FS: Her route is marked in blue.
  cz FS: Její trasa je vyznačená modře.
  EN TP: a route on a map
  cz TP: trasa na mapě
  EN FP: a bus route through town
  cz FP: autobusová trasa městem
5224 | royal (adjective): belonging to a king or queen | loc: královský
  EN TS: He has a royal band.
  cz TS: Má královskou kapelu.
  EN FS: He has a royal horse.
  cz FS: Má královského koně.
  EN TP: a royal throne
  cz TP: královský trůn
  EN FP: a royal wedding
  cz FP: královská svatba
5225 | finish (verb): to bring something to an end | loc: dokončit
  EN TS: She is finishing way ahead!
  cz TS: Dokončuje s mega náskokem!
  EN FS: She is finishing way behind!
  cz FS: Dokončuje s mega ztrátou!
  EN TP: finishing a race
  cz TP: dokončit závod
  EN FP: finishing her homework
  cz FP: dokončit domácí úkol
5226 | carriage (noun): a train car where passengers ride | loc: vagon
  EN TS: He made it into the carriage!
  cz TS: Stihl naskočit do vagonu!
  EN FS: He made it into the taxi!
  cz FS: Stihl naskočit do taxíku!
  EN TP: jumping into a train carriage
  cz TP: skok do vagonu vlaku
  EN FP: a carriage pulled by horses
  cz FP: kočár tažený koňmi
5227 | several (adjective): more than two or three, but not many | loc: několik
  EN TS: She has several new fans.
  cz TS: Má několik nových fanoušků.
  EN FS: She has several new cats.
  cz FS: Má několik nových koček.
  EN TP: several dogs running along
  cz TP: několik běžících psů
  EN FP: several cars driving along
  cz FP: několik jedoucích aut
5228 | snow (verb): to fall as snow from the sky | loc: sněžit
  EN TS: It is snowing hard!
  cz TS: Hustě sněží!
  EN FS: It is raining hard!
  cz FS: Hustě prší!
  EN TP: snowing on a city square
  cz TP: sněží na náměstí
  EN FP: snowing on a beach
  cz FP: sněží na pláži
5229 | handful (noun): the amount you can hold in your hand | loc: hrst
  EN TS: She threw a handful of snow.
  cz TS: Hodila hrst sněhu.
  EN FS: She threw a handful of sand.
  cz FS: Hodila hrst písku.
  EN TP: a handful of powdery snow
  cz TP: hrst prašanu
  EN FP: a handful of coins
  cz FP: hrst mincí
5230 | doll (noun): a small toy made to look like a person | loc: panenka
  EN TS: The doll has a doll inside!
  cz TS: Panenka má uvnitř panenku!
  EN FS: The doll has a coin inside!
  cz FS: Panenka má uvnitř minci!
  EN TP: a painted wooden doll
  cz TP: malovaná dřevěná panenka
  EN FP: a doll's house
  cz FP: domeček pro panenky
5231 | hospitality (noun): kindness in welcoming guests | loc: pohostinnost
  EN TS: Her hospitality includes tea.
  cz TS: Její pohostinnost zahrnuje čaj.
  EN FS: Her hospitality includes beer.
  cz FS: Její pohostinnost zahrnuje pivo.
  EN TP: hospitality with tea and food
  cz TP: pohostinnost s čajem a jídlem
  EN FP: a hospitality job
  cz FP: práce v pohostinství
5232 | yacht (noun): a boat with sails used for cruising or racing | loc: jachta
  EN TS: She is sailing a yacht.
  cz TS: Pluje na jachtě.
  EN FS: She is cleaning a yacht.
  cz FS: Uklízí jachtu.
  EN TP: a classic sailing yacht
  cz TP: klasická plachetní jachta
  EN FP: a yacht in a harbour
  cz FP: jachta v přístavu
5233 | military (adjective): connected with soldiers and the army | loc: vojenský
  EN TS: The military parade is huge.
  cz TS: Vojenská přehlídka je obrovská.
  EN FS: The military parade is tiny.
  cz FS: Vojenská přehlídka je maličká.
  EN TP: a military parade
  cz TP: vojenská přehlídka
  EN FP: a military hospital
  cz FP: vojenská nemocnice
5234 | rank (noun): a row of soldiers standing side by side | loc: řada
  EN TS: Each rank is perfectly level.
  cz TS: Každá řada je dokonale rovná.
  EN FS: Each rank is a total mess.
  cz FS: Každá řada je totální chaos.
  EN TP: ranks of saluting women
  cz TP: řady salutujících žen
  EN FP: ranks of running men
  cz FP: řady běžících mužů
5235 | cargo (noun): goods carried by a large vehicle | loc: náklad
  EN TS: She is stamping the cargo.
  cz TS: Razítkuje náklad.
  EN FS: She is painting the cargo.
  cz FS: Natírá náklad.
  EN TP: cargo at a container port
  cz TP: náklad v kontejnerovém přístavu
  EN FP: cargo at an airport
  cz FP: náklad na letišti
5236 | distance (noun): the space between two objects or points | loc: vzdálenost | checker: word_missing? | translator note: "vzdálenost" unnatural in "in the distance"; used dálka
  EN TS: The city is in the distance.
  cz TS: Město je v dálce.
  EN FS: The camel is in the distance.
  cz FS: Velbloud je v dálce.
  EN TP: towers in the distance
  cz TP: věže v dálce
  EN FP: a long-distance call
  cz FP: dálkový hovor
5237 | star (noun): a body of hot gases that shines in the sky | loc: hvězda
  EN TS: Tea under a sky full of stars.
  cz TS: Čaj pod nebem plným hvězd.
  EN FS: Tea under a sky full of birds.
  cz FS: Čaj pod nebem plným ptáků.
  EN TP: stars over a desert camp
  cz TP: hvězdy nad pouštním táborem
  EN FP: stars over a city
  cz FP: hvězdy nad městem
5238 | dune (noun): a hill of sand shaped by the wind | loc: duna
  EN TS: Red dune selfie? Iconic.
  cz TS: Selfie na rudé duně? Ikonické.
  EN FS: White dune selfie? Iconic.
  cz FS: Selfie na bílé duně? Ikonické.
  EN TP: a red dune selfie
  cz TP: selfie na rudé duně
  EN FP: a dune buggy ride
  cz FP: jízda bugynou po dunách
5239 | release (noun): the act of setting someone or something free | loc: vypuštění
  EN TS: What a perfect release!
  cz TS: Jaké dokonalé vypuštění!
  EN FS: What a perfect landing!
  cz FS: Jaké dokonalé přistání!
  EN TP: the release of a falcon
  cz TP: vypuštění sokola
  EN FP: the release of an album
  cz FP: vydání alba
5240 | wing (noun): a movable body part used for flying | loc: křídlo
  EN TS: The falcon's wings are open.
  cz TS: Sokol má roztažená křídla.
  EN FS: The falcon's wings are closed.
  cz FS: Sokol má složená křídla.
  EN TP: spreading both wings
  cz TP: obě křídla roztažená
  EN FP: chicken wings on a plate
  cz FP: kuřecí křídla na talíři
5241 | chamber (noun): an enclosed space, natural or man-made | loc: komora
  EN TS: She is sliding into a chamber.
  cz TS: Žena zajíždí do komory.
  EN FS: He is sliding into a chamber.
  cz FS: Muž zajíždí do komory.
  EN TP: a glowing medical chamber
  cz TP: zářící lékařská komora
  EN FP: a chamber music concert
  cz FP: koncert komorní hudby
5242 | elegant (adjective): graceful and stylish to look at | loc: elegantní
  EN TS: Her satin robe looks elegant.
  cz TS: Její saténový župan vypadá elegantně.
  EN FS: Her wool robe looks elegant.
  cz FS: Její vlněný župan vypadá elegantně.
  EN TP: an elegant satin robe
  cz TP: elegantní saténový župan
  EN FP: an elegant evening party
  cz FP: elegantní večírek
5243 | schedule (verb): to plan a time for an activity or event | loc: naplánovat
  EN TS: She scheduled the whole month.
  cz TS: Naplánovala celý měsíc.
  EN FS: She scheduled the whole week.
  cz FS: Naplánovala celý týden.
  EN TP: to schedule the whole month
  cz TP: naplánovat celý měsíc
  EN FP: to schedule a meeting
  cz FP: naplánovat schůzku
5244 | classmate (noun): a student in the same class at school as you | loc: spolužák
  EN TS: The classmates made a deal.
  cz TS: Spolužáci se dohodli.
  EN FS: The teachers made a deal.
  cz FS: Učitelé se dohodli.
  EN TP: two classmates meeting
  cz TP: setkání dvou spolužáků
  EN FP: a classmate's party
  cz FP: večírek spolužáka
5245 | chemical (noun): material used in or made by a reaction | loc: chemikálie
  EN TS: The chemical glows purple!
  cz TS: Chemikálie svítí fialově!
  EN FS: The chemical glows orange!
  cz FS: Chemikálie svítí oranžově!
  EN TP: a glowing purple chemical
  cz TP: svítící fialová chemikálie
  EN FP: a chemical in a tank
  cz FP: chemikálie v nádrži
5246 | flask (noun): a narrow-necked glass container for liquids | loc: baňka
  EN TS: She is holding a pink flask.
  cz TS: Drží růžovou baňku.
  EN FS: She is holding a pink phone.
  cz FS: Drží růžový telefon.
  EN TP: a flask of blue liquid
  cz TP: baňka s modrou kapalinou
  EN FP: a flask of hot tea
  cz FP: baňka s horkým čajem
5247 | footprints (noun): the marks your feet leave on soft ground | loc: šlépěje | translator note: Nonna -> Babička
  EN TS: Nonna is angry about the footprints.
  cz TS: Babička zuří kvůli šlépějím.
  EN FS: Nonna is angry about the broken vase.
  cz FS: Babička zuří kvůli rozbité váze.
  EN TP: muddy footprints in a hall
  cz TP: zablácené šlépěje v předsíni
  EN FP: muddy footprints in a garden
  cz FP: zablácené šlépěje na zahradě
5248 | rent (noun): a payment you make to use something | loc: nájemné
  EN TS: She's paying the scooter rent.
  cz TS: Platí nájemné za koloběžku.
  EN FS: She's paying the bike rent.
  cz FS: Platí nájemné za kolo.
  EN TP: the rent for a scooter
  cz TP: nájemné za koloběžku
  EN FP: the rent for a flat
  cz FP: nájemné za byt
5249 | to wash (verb): to clean your body with soap and water | loc: mýt | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is washing a pan that has seen better days.
  cz TS: Myje pánev, která zažila lepší časy.
  EN FS: He is washing a cup that has seen better days.
  cz FS: Myje hrnek, který zažil lepší časy.
  EN TP: washing a sooty pot
  cz TP: mýt začouzený hrnec
  EN FP: washing his face
  cz FP: mýt si obličej
5250 | call (noun): a telephone connection | loc: hovor
  EN TS: She is on a work call.
  cz TS: Má pracovní hovor.
  EN FS: She is on a video call.
  cz FS: Má videohovor.
  EN TP: a desk phone call
  cz TP: hovor přes stolní telefon
  EN FP: a laptop video call
  cz FP: videohovor na notebooku
5251 | type (verb): to write using a keyboard | loc: psát na klávesnici
  EN TS: She is typing and phoning!
  cz TS: Píše na klávesnici a telefonuje!
  EN FS: She is typing and eating!
  cz FS: Píše na klávesnici a jí!
  EN TP: typing while on the phone
  cz TP: psaní na klávesnici při telefonování
  EN FP: typing a text message
  cz FP: psaní SMS zprávy
5252 | tropical (adjective): from the hot wet regions near the equator | loc: tropický
  EN TS: Tropical fruit is on sale.
  cz TS: Tropické ovoce je ve slevě.
  EN FS: Frozen fruit is on sale.
  cz FS: Mražené ovoce je ve slevě.
  EN TP: a pile of tropical fruit
  cz TP: hromada tropického ovoce
  EN FP: a tropical fish tank
  cz FP: akvárium s tropickými rybami
5253 | senior (adjective): older, or higher in rank than others | loc: starší
  EN TS: These seniors dance better than me.
  cz TS: Tihle starší lidi tancujou líp než já.
  EN FS: These seniors swim better than me.
  cz FS: Tihle starší lidi plavou líp než já.
  EN TP: senior dancers in the park
  cz TP: starší tanečníci v parku
  EN FP: senior swimmers in the pool
  cz FP: starší plavci v bazénu
5254 | partner (noun): the person you are married to | loc: partner
  EN TS: Look at those partners dance!
  cz TS: Koukni, jak ti partneři tancujou!
  EN FS: Look at those partners swim!
  cz FS: Koukni, jak ti partneři plavou!
  EN TP: dancing with a partner
  cz TP: tanec s partnerem
  EN FP: playing cards with a partner
  cz FP: karty s partnerem
5255 | guilty (adjective): responsible for doing something wrong | loc: vinný
  EN TS: He looks very guilty, and very shocked.
  cz TS: Ten kluk vypadá hodně vinně a hodně v šoku.
  EN FS: She looks very guilty, and very shocked.
  cz FS: Ta holka vypadá hodně vinně a hodně v šoku.
  EN TP: a guilty young man
  cz TP: vinný mladý muž
  EN FP: a guilty judge
  cz FP: vinný soudce
5256 | address (verb): to speak to a group of people | loc: promluvit
  EN TS: A judge is addressing them.
  cz TS: Soudce k nim promlouvá.
  EN FS: A nurse is addressing them.
  cz FS: Zdravotní sestra k nim promlouvá.
  EN TP: addressing a packed hall
  cz TP: promlouvat k plnému sálu
  EN FP: addressing a letter
  cz FP: psát adresu na dopis
5257 | butler (noun): the head servant in a rich person's house | loc: komorník
  EN TS: The butler is carrying tea.
  cz TS: Komorník nese čaj.
  EN FS: The butler is carrying wine.
  cz FS: Komorník nese víno.
  EN TP: a butler carrying tea
  cz TP: komorník nesoucí čaj
  EN FP: a butler opening the door
  cz FP: komorník otevírá dveře
5258 | bar (noun): a place where alcoholic drinks are served | loc: bar
  EN TS: Rooftop bar, shaker party!
  cz TS: Bar na střeše, párty se šejkrem!
  EN FS: Basement bar, shaker party!
  cz FS: Bar ve sklepě, párty se šejkrem!
  EN TP: a rooftop bar at sunset
  cz TP: střešní bar při západu slunce
  EN FP: a bar of chocolate
  cz FP: tabulka čokolády
5259 | fur (noun): the soft thick hair covering an animal | loc: srst
  EN TS: The big dog is shaking its wet fur. Everyone gets a shower.
  cz TS: Velký pes si otřepává mokrou srst. Sprcha pro všechny.
  EN FS: The big cat is shaking its wet fur. Everyone gets a shower.
  cz FS: Velká kočka si otřepává mokrou srst. Sprcha pro všechny.
  EN TP: shaking its wet fur
  cz TP: otřepávání mokré srsti
  EN FP: brushing its wet fur
  cz FP: kartáčování mokré srsti
5260 | shame (noun): a painful feeling of guilt | loc: stud
  EN TS: Caught with cake. The shame!
  cz TS: Přistižen s dortem. Ten stud!
  EN FS: Caught with pizza. The shame!
  cz FS: Přistižen s pizzou. Ten stud!
  EN TP: shame over a cake
  cz TP: stud kvůli dortu
  EN FP: shame over a broken plate
  cz FP: stud kvůli rozbitému talíři
5261 | share (noun): the part you get when something is divided | loc: podíl
  EN TS: Even the jogger got a share!
  cz TS: I běžec dostal svůj podíl!
  EN FS: Even the cyclist got a share!
  cz FS: I cyklista dostal svůj podíl!
  EN TP: a share of the pizza
  cz TP: podíl z pizzy
  EN FP: a share of the company
  cz FP: podíl ve firmě
5262 | stable (adjective): not likely to change position or fall over | loc: stabilní
  EN TS: Such a "stable" shelf!
  cz TS: Taková „stabilní" police!
  EN FS: Such a "stable" table!
  cz FS: Takový „stabilní" stůl!
  EN TP: a not very stable shelf
  cz TP: ne moc stabilní police
  EN FP: a stable wooden chair
  cz FP: stabilní dřevěná židle
5263 | photograph (noun): a printed picture of a person or scene | loc: fotografie
  EN TS: A photograph is on the shelf.
  cz TS: Na polici je fotografie.
  EN FS: A mirror is on the shelf.
  cz FS: Na polici je zrcadlo.
  EN TP: a framed family photograph
  cz TP: zarámovaná rodinná fotografie
  EN FP: taking a family photograph
  cz FP: focení rodinné fotografie
5264 | shift (verb): to change the place something is in | loc: přesunout | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is shifting the sofa.
  cz TS: Přesouvá gauč.
  EN FS: She is shifting the fridge.
  cz FS: Přesouvá lednici.
  EN TP: shifting furniture around
  cz TP: přesouvání nábytku
  EN FP: shifting gears in a car
  cz FP: řazení rychlostí v autě
5265 | container (noun): any object used to hold things | loc: kontejner
  EN TS: The ship carries containers.
  cz TS: Loď veze kontejnery.
  EN FS: The ship carries cars.
  cz FS: Loď veze auta.
  EN TP: a ship with containers
  cz TP: loď s kontejnery
  EN FP: a truck with containers
  cz FP: náklaďák s kontejnery
5266 | telephone (noun): equipment you use to talk to someone far away | loc: telefon
  EN TS: She dropped the telephone!
  cz TS: Upustila telefon!
  EN FS: She dropped the teacup!
  cz FS: Upustila šálek!
  EN TP: a dropped telephone
  cz TP: upuštěný telefon
  EN FP: a telephone box
  cz FP: telefonní budka
5267 | gun (noun): a weapon that fires a bullet at high speed | loc: zbraň
  EN TS: Her gun is resting on a stand.
  cz TS: Její zbraň leží na stojanu.
  EN FS: Her gun is resting on a chair.
  cz FS: Její zbraň leží na židli.
  EN TP: a gun on a stand
  cz TP: zbraň na stojanu
  EN FP: a gun in a holster
  cz FP: zbraň v pouzdře
5268 | rifle (noun): a long gun you hold with two hands | loc: puška
  EN TS: She's aiming her rifle.
  cz TS: Míří puškou.
  EN FS: She's cleaning her rifle.
  cz FS: Čistí pušku.
  EN TP: shooting a rifle lying down
  cz TP: střelba z pušky vleže
  EN FP: carrying a rifle on skis
  cz FP: puška na zádech na lyžích
5269 | purchase (verb): to obtain or acquire something by paying | loc: koupit
  EN TS: She purchased a coat.
  cz TS: Koupila si kabát.
  EN FS: She purchased a dress.
  cz FS: Koupila si šaty.
  EN TP: purchasing an olive coat
  cz TP: kupuje olivový kabát
  EN FP: purchasing a new car
  cz FP: kupuje nové auto
5270 | supermarket (noun): a big store selling food and household goods | loc: supermarket
  EN TS: She is buying all the supermarket's cereal!
  cz TS: Vykupuje všechny cereálie v supermarketu!
  EN FS: She is buying all the supermarket's soup!
  cz FS: Vykupuje všechny polévky v supermarketu!
  EN TP: a supermarket trolley
  cz TP: nákupní vozík ze supermarketu
  EN FP: a supermarket car park
  cz FP: parkoviště u supermarketu
5271 | cry (noun): a loud shout or call | loc: výkřik
  EN TS: Their cry fills the canyon!
  cz TS: Jejich výkřik plní kaňon!
  EN FS: Their song fills the canyon!
  cz FS: Jejich píseň plní kaňon!
  EN TP: a cry over the canyon
  cz TP: výkřik nad kaňonem
  EN FP: a cry for help
  cz FP: výkřik o pomoc
5272 | hiker (noun): a person who walks long distances in nature | loc: turista
  EN TS: The hikers are going wild.
  cz TS: Turisti úplně šílí.
  EN FS: The hikers are going home.
  cz FS: Turisti jdou domů.
  EN TP: hikers cheering at a canyon
  cz TP: turisti jásají u kaňonu
  EN FP: hikers resting in a tent
  cz FP: turisti odpočívají ve stanu
5273 | model (noun): a person who poses for a photographer | loc: modelka
  EN TS: The model rocks green trousers.
  cz TS: Modelka válí v zelených kalhotách.
  EN FS: The model rocks orange trousers.
  cz FS: Modelka válí v oranžových kalhotách.
  EN TP: a model on the runway
  cz TP: modelka na molu
  EN FP: a model of a plane
  cz FP: model letadla
5274 | soaked (adjective): completely wet, right through | loc: promočený
  EN TS: Shower on. Now he is soaked.
  cz TS: Sprcha puštěná. Teď je promočený.
  EN FS: Shower off. Now he is soaked.
  cz FS: Sprcha vypnutá. Teď je promočený.
  EN TP: soaked in the shower
  cz TP: promočený ve sprše
  EN FP: soaked in the rain
  cz FP: promočený v dešti
5275 | selfish (adjective): only concerned with yourself, not with others | loc: sobecký
  EN TS: Two selfish kids, one remote.
  cz TS: Dvě sobecké děti, jeden ovladač.
  EN FS: Two selfish kids, one phone.
  cz FS: Dvě sobecké děti, jeden mobil.
  EN TP: selfish kids fighting
  cz TP: hádající se sobecké děti
  EN FP: a selfish driver parking
  cz FP: sobecký řidič parkuje
5276 | sibling (noun): your brother or your sister | loc: sourozenec
  EN TS: One cookie, two siblings: war.
  cz TS: Jedna sušenka, dva sourozenci: válka.
  EN FS: One cake, two siblings: war.
  cz FS: Jeden dort, dva sourozenci: válka.
  EN TP: siblings building a den
  cz TP: sourozenci stavějí bunkr
  EN FP: siblings doing homework
  cz FP: sourozenci dělají úkoly
5277 | agree (verb): to be in agreement with someone | loc: souhlasit
  EN TS: They agreed: half each.
  cz TS: Souhlasili: každý půlku.
  EN FS: They agreed: all for him.
  cz FS: Souhlasili: všechno pro něj.
  EN TP: agreeing to share a cookie
  cz TP: souhlasit s půlkou sušenky
  EN FP: agreeing to share a room
  cz FP: souhlasit se společným pokojem
5278 | corner (noun): the place where two streets meet | loc: roh
  EN TS: Corner reached. Moving on.
  cz TS: Roh dosažen. Pokračujeme.
  EN FS: River reached. Moving on.
  cz FS: Řeka dosažena. Pokračujeme.
  EN TP: the corner of two streets
  cz TP: roh dvou ulic
  EN FP: a corner of the room
  cz FP: roh pokoje
5279 | scroll (noun): a long rolled sheet covered in handwriting | loc: svitek
  EN TS: He is signing a giant scroll with a giant pen!
  cz TS: Podepisuje obří svitek obřím perem!
  EN FS: He is signing a giant scroll with a tiny pen!
  cz FS: Podepisuje obří svitek maličkým perem!
  EN TP: signing a giant scroll
  cz TP: podepisování obřího svitku
  EN FP: reading an old scroll
  cz FP: čtení starého svitku
5280 | signpost (noun): a post with arms that point the way | loc: rozcestník
  EN TS: She is reading the signpost.
  cz TS: Čte rozcestník.
  EN FS: She is painting the signpost.
  cz FS: Natírá rozcestník.
  EN TP: reading a wooden signpost
  cz TP: čtení dřevěného rozcestníku
  EN FP: painting a wooden signpost
  cz FP: natírání dřevěného rozcestníku
5281 | star (noun): someone who is very skilled and famous | loc: hvězda
  EN TS: The star is singing on stage.
  cz TS: Hvězda zpívá na pódiu.
  EN FS: The star is dancing on stage.
  cz FS: Hvězda tančí na pódiu.
  EN TP: a star on stage
  cz TP: hvězda na pódiu
  EN FP: a star in the sky
  cz FP: hvězda na obloze
5282 | song (noun): a short piece of music with words | loc: píseň
  EN TS: Everyone is singing a song.
  cz TS: Všichni zpívají píseň.
  EN FS: Everyone is writing a song.
  cz FS: Všichni píšou píseň.
  EN TP: singing a song
  cz TP: zpívání písně
  EN FP: a song on the radio
  cz FP: píseň v rádiu
5283 | tower (noun): anything shaped like a tall column | loc: věž
  EN TS: It's just a small tower of plates.
  cz TS: Je to jen malá věž z talířů.
  EN FS: It's just a small tower of cups.
  cz FS: Je to jen malá věž z hrnků.
  EN TP: a tower of plates
  cz TP: věž z talířů
  EN FP: a tower of glasses
  cz FP: věž ze skleniček
5284 | metal (adjective): made of metal | loc: kovový
  EN TS: Love the metal armour, knight.
  cz TS: Ta kovová zbroj ti sluší, rytíři.
  EN FS: Love the metal crown, knight.
  cz FS: Ta kovová koruna ti sluší, rytíři.
  EN TP: a full metal suit
  cz TP: celá kovová zbroj
  EN FP: a full metal band
  cz FP: celá metalová kapela
5285 | happiness (noun): the feeling of joy and contentment | loc: štěstí
  EN TS: Pure happiness in the garden.
  cz TS: Čisté štěstí na zahradě.
  EN FS: Pure happiness in the kitchen.
  cz FS: Čisté štěstí v kuchyni.
  EN TP: happiness in a sunny garden
  cz TP: štěstí na slunné zahradě
  EN FP: happiness on a sunny beach
  cz FP: štěstí na slunné pláži
5286 | sweatshirt (noun): a warm soft long-sleeved top, often oversized | loc: mikina
  EN TS: They both want the sweatshirt!
  cz TS: Oba chtějí tu mikinu!
  EN FS: They both want the teddy bear!
  cz FS: Oba chtějí toho plyšáka!
  EN TP: pulling a lilac sweatshirt
  cz TP: tahání o šeříkovou mikinu
  EN FP: washing a lilac sweatshirt
  cz FP: praní šeříkové mikiny
5287 | silence (noun): when no one is speaking | loc: ticho
  EN TS: Fifteen girls, zero silence!
  cz TS: Patnáct holek, nula ticha!
  EN FS: Fifteen boys, zero silence!
  cz FS: Patnáct kluků, nula ticha!
  EN TP: a room without silence
  cz TP: místnost bez ticha
  EN FP: a minute of silence
  cz FP: minuta ticha
5288 | ski (noun): narrow runners used in pairs to glide on snow | loc: lyže
  EN TS: He is flying down on his skis!
  cz TS: Letí dolů na lyžích!
  EN FS: He is flying down on his sled!
  cz FS: Letí dolů na sáňkách!
  EN TP: carving on skis
  cz TP: carving na lyžích
  EN FP: skis leaning on a wall
  cz FP: lyže opřené o zeď
5289 | moisture (noun): wetness caused by water | loc: vlhkost
  EN TS: The skin lacks moisture.
  cz TS: Pleti chybí vlhkost.
  EN FS: The skin lacks pores.
  cz FS: Pleti chybí póry.
  EN TP: skin without moisture
  cz TP: pleť bez vlhkosti
  EN FP: moisture on a window
  cz FP: vlhkost na okně
5290 | skyscraper (noun): a very tall building with many floors | loc: mrakodrap
  EN TS: What a tall skyscraper!
  cz TS: To je ale vysoký mrakodrap!
  EN FS: What a tall lighthouse!
  cz FS: To je ale vysoký maják!
  EN TP: a spire-topped skyscraper
  cz TP: mrakodrap se špicí
  EN FP: a skyscraper being built
  cz FP: stavba mrakodrapu
5291 | businessman (noun): a man who works in business, often in a suit | loc: podnikatel
  EN TS: Every businessman is sleeping.
  cz TS: Každý podnikatel spí.
  EN FS: Every businessman is reading.
  cz FS: Každý podnikatel čte.
  EN TP: businessmen asleep on a plane
  cz TP: podnikatelé spící v letadle
  EN FP: businessmen asleep on a train
  cz FP: podnikatelé spící ve vlaku
5292 | productive (adjective): producing a lot of work | loc: produktivní
  EN TS: Nobody here is very productive.
  cz TS: Nikdo tu není moc produktivní.
  EN FS: Everybody here is very productive.
  cz FS: Všichni tu jsou velmi produktivní.
  EN TP: not a productive day
  cz TP: ne moc produktivní den
  EN FP: a productive team meeting
  cz FP: produktivní porada týmu
5293 | glove (noun): the handwear used to catch a baseball | loc: rukavice
  EN TS: The ball is in his glove now.
  cz TS: Míček je teď v jeho rukavici.
  EN FS: The ball is in his cap now.
  cz FS: Míček je teď v jeho čepici.
  EN TP: a leather baseball glove
  cz TP: kožená baseballová rukavice
  EN FP: a glove for the winter
  cz FP: rukavice na zimu
5294 | slippers (noun): soft warm shoes worn inside the house | loc: papuče
  EN TS: Her feet love the slippers.
  cz TS: Její nohy milujou ty papuče.
  EN FS: Her feet love the socks.
  cz FS: Její nohy milujou ty ponožky.
  EN TP: fluffy sheep slippers
  cz TP: chlupaté ovečkové papuče
  EN FP: slippers under the bed
  cz FP: papuče pod postelí
5295 | horn (noun): a thing you blow to make a loud noise | loc: roh
  EN TS: He is blowing a huge horn.
  cz TS: Troubí na obrovský roh.
  EN FS: He is blowing a tiny horn.
  cz FS: Troubí na maličký roh.
  EN TP: blowing a long horn
  cz TP: troubení na dlouhý roh
  EN FP: a horn on a sheep
  cz FP: roh na hlavě ovce
5296 | traditional (adjective): done or worn as it was long ago | loc: tradiční
  EN TS: He is making traditional food!
  cz TS: Vaří tradiční jídlo!
  EN FS: He is buying traditional food!
  cz FS: Kupuje tradiční jídlo!
  EN TP: cooking traditional food
  cz TP: vaření tradičního jídla
  EN FP: a traditional dance
  cz FP: tradiční tanec
5297 | ruin (noun): a state of total destruction | loc: rozpad
  EN TS: The old castle lies in ruins.
  cz TS: Starý hrad je v úplném rozpadu.
  EN FS: The old bridge lies in ruins.
  cz FS: Starý most je v úplném rozpadu.
  EN TP: a castle in ruins
  cz TP: hrad v rozpadu
  EN FP: a castle in the snow
  cz FP: hrad ve sněhu
5298 | blazer (noun): a smart formal jacket worn over a shirt | loc: sako
  EN TS: Her blazer is beige.
  cz TS: Její sako je béžové.
  EN FS: Her blazer is black.
  cz FS: Její sako je černé.
  EN TP: a beige tailored blazer
  cz TP: béžové sako na míru
  EN FP: trying on a blazer
  cz FP: zkoušení saka
5299 | illegal (adjective): not allowed by law or the rules | loc: nelegální
  EN TS: Her sausages are illegal here!
  cz TS: Její klobásy jsou tady nelegální!
  EN FS: Her books are illegal here!
  cz FS: Její knížky jsou tady nelegální!
  EN TP: illegal food in a suitcase
  cz TP: nelegální jídlo v kufru
  EN FP: illegal parking at the airport
  cz FP: nelegální parkování na letišti
5300 | threat (noun): something that is a source of danger | loc: hrozba
  EN TS: The viper is a real threat.
  cz TS: Zmije je skutečná hrozba.
  EN FS: The lizard is a real threat.
  cz FS: Ještěrka je skutečná hrozba.
  EN TP: a threat on the rocks
  cz TP: hrozba na skalách
  EN FP: a threat in a letter
  cz FP: hrozba v dopise
5301 | allergy (noun): a bad body reaction to pollen or dust | loc: alergie
  EN TS: Her allergy hates this meadow.
  cz TS: Její alergie nesnáší tuhle louku.
  EN FS: Her allergy hates this beach.
  cz FS: Její alergie nesnáší tuhle pláž.
  EN TP: an allergy to pollen
  cz TP: alergie na pyl
  EN FP: an allergy to dogs
  cz FP: alergie na psy
5302 | blossom (noun): a flower on a tree, like cherry blossom | loc: květ
  EN TS: The blossoms made him sneeze!
  cz TS: Květy ho rozkýchaly!
  EN FS: The blossoms made him cry!
  cz FS: Květy ho rozplakaly!
  EN TP: sneezing under blossoms
  cz TP: kýchání pod květy
  EN FP: painting cherry blossoms
  cz FP: malování třešňových květů
5303 | snowflake (noun): a single small ice crystal that falls as snow | loc: sněhová vločka
  EN TS: Snowflakes on her mitten.
  cz TS: Sněhové vločky na jejím palčáku.
  EN FS: Snowflakes on her shoe.
  cz FS: Sněhové vločky na její botě.
  EN TP: a snowflake on a mitten
  cz TP: sněhová vločka na palčáku
  EN FP: a snowflake on a window
  cz FP: sněhová vločka na okně
5304 | dirt (noun): mud, dust or grime that makes something unclean | loc: špína
  EN TS: Ew! Dirt all over her hands!
  cz TS: Fuj! Špína po celých rukou!
  EN FS: Ew! Paint all over her hands!
  cz FS: Fuj! Barva po celých rukou!
  EN TP: dirt on her hands
  cz TP: špína na rukou
  EN FP: dirt on her shoes
  cz FP: špína na botách
5305 | society (noun): a large social group with its own culture | loc: společnost
  EN TS: Their society is hard at work.
  cz TS: Jejich společnost tvrdě pracuje.
  EN FS: Their society is on holiday.
  cz FS: Jejich společnost je na dovolené.
  EN TP: a whole society at work
  cz TP: celá společnost při práci
  EN FP: a society at a party
  cz FP: společnost na večírku
5306 | comfortable (adjective): giving a feeling of physical well-being | loc: pohodlný
  EN TS: So comfortable on one sofa!
  cz TS: Tak pohodlně na jednom gauči!
  EN FS: So comfortable on one bed!
  cz FS: Tak pohodlně na jedné posteli!
  EN TP: comfortable on a full sofa
  cz TP: pohodlně na plném gauči
  EN FP: comfortable in a big bed
  cz FP: pohodlně ve velké posteli
5307 | spacious (adjective): having a lot of open room inside | loc: prostorný
  EN TS: The room is very spacious.
  cz TS: Pokoj je velmi prostorný.
  EN FS: The room is very small.
  cz FS: Pokoj je velmi malý.
  EN TP: a spacious living room
  cz TP: prostorný obývák
  EN FP: a spacious car boot
  cz FP: prostorný kufr auta
5308 | sunflower (noun): a very tall flower with a big round yellow head | loc: slunečnice
  EN TS: A man brings her sunflowers.
  cz TS: Muž jí nese slunečnice.
  EN FS: A man brings her roses.
  cz FS: Muž jí nese růže.
  EN TP: a bunch of sunflowers
  cz TP: kytice slunečnic
  EN FP: a field of sunflowers
  cz FP: pole slunečnic
5309 | note (noun): a short written record | loc: vzkaz
  EN TS: Someone left her a sweet note.
  cz TS: Někdo jí nechal sladký vzkaz.
  EN FS: Someone left her a sad note.
  cz FS: Někdo jí nechal smutný vzkaz.
  EN TP: a note with a smiley
  cz TP: vzkaz se smajlíkem
  EN FP: a note on the fridge
  cz FP: vzkaz na lednici
5310 | son (noun): a male child of his parents | loc: syn
  EN TS: A son is helping fix the car.
  cz TS: Syn pomáhá opravovat auto.
  EN FS: A son is helping wash the car.
  cz FS: Syn pomáhá mýt auto.
  EN TP: a son holding a spanner
  cz TP: syn s klíčem v ruce
  EN FP: a son washing the car
  cz FP: syn myje auto
5311 | calm (adjective): quiet, relaxed and not worried at all | loc: klidný
  EN TS: Now the whole group is calm.
  cz TS: Celá skupina je teď klidná.
  EN FS: Now the whole group is angry.
  cz FS: Celá skupina je teď naštvaná.
  EN TP: calm under blankets
  cz TP: klidní pod dekami
  EN FP: calm under pressure
  cz FP: klidný pod tlakem
5312 | backyard (noun): the private grassy area behind a house | loc: dvorek za domem
  EN TS: Backyard barbecue? Let's go!
  cz TS: Grilovačka na dvorku za domem? Jdem do toho!
  EN FS: Backyard pool party? Let's go!
  cz FS: Bazénová párty na dvorku za domem? Jdem do toho!
  EN TP: a barbecue in the backyard
  cz TP: grilování na dvorku za domem
  EN FP: a pool in the backyard
  cz FP: bazén na dvorku za domem
5313 | neon (adjective): glowing in bright electric colours | loc: neonový
  EN TS: Neon signs cover every wall.
  cz TS: Neonové nápisy pokrývají každou zeď.
  EN FS: Paper signs cover every wall.
  cz FS: Papírové nápisy pokrývají každou zeď.
  EN TP: glowing neon signs
  cz TP: zářící neonové nápisy
  EN FP: neon lights in a club
  cz FP: neonová světla v klubu
5314 | basket (noun): a woven container with handles | loc: košík
  EN TS: Her basket holds all of Paris!
  cz TS: V jejím košíku je celá Paříž!
  EN FS: Her bag holds all of Paris!
  cz FS: V její tašce je celá Paříž!
  EN TP: a basket of souvenirs
  cz TP: košík suvenýrů
  EN FP: a basket of fruit
  cz FP: košík ovoce
5315 | postcard (noun): a card with a picture you write on and send | loc: pohlednice
  EN TS: She has a lot of postcards. For whom?
  cz TS: Má spoustu pohlednic. Pro koho?
  EN FS: She has a lot of stamps. For whom?
  cz FS: Má spoustu známek. Pro koho?
  EN TP: postcards of Paris
  cz TP: pohlednice Paříže
  EN FP: writing a postcard
  cz FP: psaní pohlednice
5316 | curly (adjective): growing in curls instead of straight | loc: kudrnatý
  EN TS: Love her bouncy curly hair.
  cz TS: Zbožňuju její pružné kudrnaté vlasy.
  EN FS: Love her bouncy straight hair.
  cz FS: Zbožňuju její pružné rovné vlasy.
  EN TP: tight curly dark hair
  cz TP: hustě kudrnaté tmavé vlasy
  EN FP: long curly blonde hair
  cz FP: dlouhé kudrnaté blond vlasy
5317 | ruffle (noun): a strip of frilly fabric used as trim | loc: volán
  EN TS: Her ruffles are flying!
  cz TS: Její volány lítají!
  EN FS: Her shoes are flying!
  cz FS: Její boty lítají!
  EN TP: layers of red ruffles
  cz TP: vrstvy červených volánů
  EN FP: ruffles on a shirt collar
  cz FP: volány na límečku košile
5318 | speak (verb): to express something in speech | loc: mluvit
  EN TS: She is speaking to the public.
  cz TS: Mluví k veřejnosti.
  EN FS: She is singing to the public.
  cz FS: Zpívá veřejnosti.
  EN TP: speaking into a microphone
  cz TP: mluví do mikrofonu
  EN FP: speaking on the phone
  cz FP: mluví do telefonu
5319 | web (noun): a network formed by weaving threads | loc: pavučina
  EN TS: The spider is below its web.
  cz TS: Pavouk je pod svou pavučinou.
  EN FS: The spider is above its web.
  cz FS: Pavouk je nad svou pavučinou.
  EN TP: a web between branches
  cz TP: pavučina mezi větvemi
  EN FP: a web in a corner
  cz FP: pavučina v rohu
5320 | demonstrate (verb): to show something to an audience | loc: předvést
  EN TS: She is demonstrating a spine.
  cz TS: Předvádí páteř.
  EN FS: She is demonstrating a heart.
  cz FS: Předvádí srdce.
  EN TP: demonstrating on a spine model
  cz TP: předvádění na modelu páteře
  EN FP: demonstrating in the street
  cz FP: demonstrace na ulici
5321 | skate (verb): to glide over ice wearing ice skates | loc: bruslit
  EN TS: He is skating like a pro.
  cz TS: Bruslí jak profík.
  EN FS: He is skiing like a pro.
  cz FS: Lyžuje jak profík.
  EN TP: skating on one leg
  cz TP: bruslení na jedné noze
  EN FP: skating on a road
  cz FP: bruslení na silnici
5322 | spit (verb): to force water or saliva out of your mouth | loc: plivat
  EN TS: Bad soup! He spat it out.
  cz TS: Hnusná polívka! Vyplivl ji.
  EN FS: Bad tea! He spat it out.
  cz FS: Hnusnej čaj! Vyplivl ho.
  EN TP: spitting out green soup
  cz TP: vyplivnout zelenou polívku
  EN FP: spitting out a cherry stone
  cz FP: vyplivnout pecku z třešně
5323 | stone (noun): a lump or mass of hard rock | loc: kámen
  EN TS: That stone made a big splash.
  cz TS: Ten kámen udělal pořádný šplouch.
  EN FS: That boat made a big splash.
  cz FS: Ta loďka udělala pořádný šplouch.
  EN TP: throwing a big stone
  cz TP: házení velkého kamene
  EN FP: skimming a flat stone
  cz FP: házení žabek plochým kamenem
5324 | sponge (noun): a soft object with holes used for washing | loc: houba
  EN TS: The sponge beat the sauce!
  cz TS: Houba porazila omáčku!
  EN FS: The sponge beat the cheese!
  cz FS: Houba porazila sýr!
  EN TP: a soapy sponge
  cz TP: houba plná pěny
  EN FP: a sponge cake
  cz FP: piškotový korpus
5325 | spouse (noun): a person's partner in marriage | loc: manžel
  EN TS: The spouses signed a document.
  cz TS: Manželé podepsali dokument.
  EN FS: The spouses burned a document.
  cz FS: Manželé spálili dokument.
  EN TP: spouses signing papers
  cz TP: manželé podepisují papíry
  EN FP: spouses arguing at home
  cz FP: manželé se hádají doma
5326 | coach (noun): someone in charge of training an athlete or team | loc: trenér
  EN TS: The coach is taping her ankle.
  cz TS: Trenér jí tejpuje kotník.
  EN FS: The coach is taping her wrist.
  cz FS: Trenér jí tejpuje zápěstí.
  EN TP: a coach helping a gymnast
  cz TP: trenér pomáhá gymnastce
  EN FP: a coach shouting at players
  cz FP: trenér křičí na hráče
5327 | cape (noun): a loose sleeveless coat hanging from the shoulders | loc: plášť
  EN TS: The client wears a black cape.
  cz TS: Klientka má černý plášť.
  EN FS: The client wears a white cape.
  cz FS: Klientka má bílý plášť.
  EN TP: a black salon cape
  cz TP: černý kadeřnický plášť
  EN FP: a superhero cape
  cz FP: plášť superhrdiny
5328 | blouse (noun): a loose light shirt worn by women | loc: halenka
  EN TS: She is sniffing a peach blouse.
  cz TS: Čichá k broskvové halence.
  EN FS: She is sniffing a white blouse.
  cz FS: Čichá k bílé halence.
  EN TP: a peach ruffled blouse
  cz TP: broskvová halenka s volány
  EN FP: ironing a peach blouse
  cz FP: žehlení broskvové halenky
5329 | seed (noun): the small hard part that grows into a plant | loc: semínko
  EN TS: The seed has a tiny root!
  cz TS: Semínko má malinký kořínek!
  EN FS: The seed has a tiny flower!
  cz FS: Semínko má malinkou kytičku!
  EN TP: a seed with a root
  cz TP: semínko s kořínkem
  EN FP: a seed in a beak
  cz FP: semínko v zobáku
5330 | spy (noun): a person who secretly finds out information | loc: špion
  EN TS: The "secret" spy has a hole in his newspaper.
  cz TS: „Tajný" špion má v novinách díru.
  EN FS: The "secret" spy has a hole in his hat.
  cz FS: „Tajný" špion má v klobouku díru.
  EN TP: a spy behind a newspaper
  cz TP: špion za novinami
  EN FP: a spy behind a door
  cz FP: špion za dveřmi
5331 | fitness (noun): good physical condition | loc: kondice
  EN TS: Her fitness? She crushes watermelons!
  cz TS: Její kondice? Drtí melouny!
  EN FS: Her fitness? She crushes coconuts!
  cz FS: Její kondice? Drtí kokosy!
  EN TP: fitness at a beach bar
  cz TP: kondice u plážového baru
  EN FP: a fitness app
  cz FP: aplikace na kondici
5332 | unity (noun): being one undivided whole | loc: jednota
  EN TS: The staff shows strong unity.
  cz TS: Personál projevuje silnou jednotu.
  EN FS: The guests show strong unity.
  cz FS: Hosté projevují silnou jednotu.
  EN TP: the unity of the team
  cz TP: jednota týmu
  EN FP: the unity of the country
  cz FP: jednota země
5333 | staircase (noun): a set of stairs inside a building | loc: schodiště
  EN TS: Each staircase is fancier!
  cz TS: Každé schodiště je luxusnější!
  EN FS: Each staircase is dirtier!
  cz FS: Každé schodiště je špinavější!
  EN TP: a grand marble staircase
  cz TP: velkolepé mramorové schodiště
  EN FP: a staircase in a lighthouse
  cz FP: schodiště v majáku
5334 | respect (verb): to show respect towards someone | loc: respektovat
  EN TS: The fans respect this moment.
  cz TS: Fanoušci tuhle chvíli respektují.
  EN FS: The fans ignore this moment.
  cz FS: Fanoušci tuhle chvíli ignorují.
  EN TP: respecting the moment
  cz TP: respektovat tu chvíli
  EN FP: respecting the speed limit
  cz FP: respektovat rychlostní limit
5335 | enthusiastic (adjective): showing great excitement and interest | loc: nadšený
  EN TS: She is an enthusiastic fan.
  cz TS: Je nadšená fanynka.
  EN FS: She is an enthusiastic player.
  cz FS: Je nadšená hráčka.
  EN TP: an enthusiastic football fan
  cz TP: nadšená fotbalová fanynka
  EN FP: an enthusiastic tennis fan
  cz FP: nadšená tenisová fanynka
5336 | loyalty (noun): the quality of being loyal | loc: věrnost
  EN TS: His cap shows his loyalty.
  cz TS: Jeho kšiltovka ukazuje jeho věrnost.
  EN FS: His scarf shows his loyalty.
  cz FS: Jeho šála ukazuje jeho věrnost.
  EN TP: loyalty to the club
  cz TP: věrnost klubu
  EN FP: loyalty to the king
  cz FP: věrnost králi
5337 | rail (noun): the railway, the train system | loc: železnice
  EN TS: Croissant in mouth, he is travelling by rail.
  cz TS: S croissantem v puse cestuje po železnici.
  EN FS: Pizza in mouth, he is travelling by rail.
  cz FS: S pizzou v puse cestuje po železnici.
  EN TP: travelling by rail
  cz TP: cestování po železnici
  EN FP: travelling by air
  cz FP: cestování letadlem
5338 | stay (verb): to stay put in one certain place | loc: zůstat
  EN TS: You can stay for 10 euros or for 10,000 euros.
  cz TS: Zůstat můžeš za 10 eur, nebo za 10 000 eur.
  EN FS: You can stay for 10 euros or for 1,000 euros.
  cz FS: Zůstat můžeš za 10 eur, nebo za 1 000 eur.
  EN TP: staying in a hostel
  cz TP: zůstat v hostelu
  EN FP: staying at home
  cz FP: zůstat doma
5339 | control (verb): to handle a machine and make it function | loc: ovládat
  EN TS: She is controlling a bus.
  cz TS: Ovládá autobus.
  EN FS: She is controlling a tram.
  cz FS: Ovládá tramvaj.
  EN TP: controlling a city bus
  cz TP: ovládání městského autobusu
  EN FP: controlling a drone
  cz FP: ovládání dronu
5340 | garage (noun): a building where a car is kept | loc: garáž
  EN TS: A box is going to the garage.
  cz TS: Krabice jede do garáže.
  EN FS: A box is going to the car.
  cz FS: Krabice jede do auta.
  EN TP: an open garage
  cz TP: otevřená garáž
  EN FP: a garage full of cars
  cz FP: garáž plná aut
5341 | nail (verb): to attach something with nails | loc: přibít
  EN TS: The boy is nailing a plank.
  cz TS: Kluk přibíjí prkno.
  EN FS: The boy is painting a plank.
  cz FS: Kluk natírá prkno.
  EN TP: nailing a plank
  cz TP: přibíjení prkna
  EN FP: nailing a poster
  cz FP: přibíjení plakátu
5342 | tongue (noun): the soft muscular part inside your mouth | loc: jazyk
  EN TS: Frosting on her tongue. Yum!
  cz TS: Poleva na jazyku. Mňam!
  EN FS: Ketchup on her tongue. Yum!
  cz FS: Kečup na jazyku. Mňam!
  EN TP: frosting on her tongue
  cz TP: poleva na jazyku
  EN FP: burning her tongue on tea
  cz FP: spálený jazyk od čaje
5343 | twin (adjective): being two identical ones that match | loc: stejný
  EN TS: The girls have twin beds.
  cz TS: Holky mají stejné postele.
  EN FS: The girls have bunk beds.
  cz FS: Holky mají patrové postele.
  EN TP: two matching twin beds
  cz TP: dvě stejné oddělené postele
  EN FP: a hotel twin room
  cz FP: dvoulůžkový pokoj v hotelu
5344 | quilt (noun): a warm cover sewn from many pieces of cloth | loc: prošívaná deka
  EN TS: They made a big quilt!
  cz TS: Ušili velkou prošívanou deku!
  EN FS: They made a big flag!
  cz FS: Ušili velkou vlajku!
  EN TP: a finished patchwork quilt
  cz TP: hotová prošívaná deka
  EN FP: a quilt on a bed
  cz FP: prošívaná deka na posteli
5345 | lean (verb): to rest your body sideways on something | loc: opřít se | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is leaning on the railing.
  cz TS: Opírá se o zábradlí.
  EN FS: She is leaning on a tree.
  cz FS: Opírá se o strom.
  EN TP: leaning on a bridge railing
  cz TP: opírat se o zábradlí mostu
  EN FP: leaning on a garden fence
  cz FP: opírat se o zahradní plot
5346 | stomach (noun): the muscular organ that holds the food you eat | loc: žaludek
  EN TS: He is patting his stomach.
  cz TS: Poplácává se po žaludku.
  EN FS: He is patting his head.
  cz FS: Poplácává se po hlavě.
  EN TP: a full stomach
  cz TP: plný žaludek
  EN FP: a stomach full of soup
  cz FP: žaludek plný polévky
5347 | stop (noun): the act of stopping something | loc: zastavení
  EN TS: Traffic is coming to a stop.
  cz TS: Provoz se blíží k zastavení.
  EN FS: Trains are coming to a stop.
  cz FS: Vlaky se blíží k zastavení.
  EN TP: a stop for the traffic
  cz TP: zastavení dopravy
  EN FP: a stop for a coffee
  cz FP: zastavení na kafe
5348 | thank (verb): to express gratitude to someone | loc: poděkovat | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is thanking the man with the umbrella.
  cz TS: Děkuje muži s deštníkem.
  EN FS: She is thanking the man with the dog.
  cz FS: Děkuje muži se psem.
  EN TP: to thank a kind stranger
  cz TP: poděkovat laskavému cizinci
  EN FP: to thank the bus driver
  cz FP: poděkovat řidiči autobusu
5349 | award (verb): to give something as an honor or reward | loc: udělit
  EN TS: She is awarding yet another medal!
  cz TS: Uděluje už další medaili!
  EN FS: She is awarding yet another trophy!
  cz FS: Uděluje už další pohár!
  EN TP: awarding a medal
  cz TP: udělení medaile
  EN FP: awarding a song prize
  cz FP: udělení ceny za píseň
5350 | creek (noun): a small natural stream of water | loc: potok
  EN TS: Mid-air over the creek. Brave!
  cz TS: Ve vzduchu nad potokem. Odvaha!
  EN FS: Mid-air over the lake. Brave!
  cz FS: Ve vzduchu nad jezerem. Odvaha!
  EN TP: jumping across a creek
  cz TP: skok přes potok
  EN FP: swimming in a creek
  cz FP: plavání v potoce
5351 | streetlight (noun): a tall lamp that lights a street at night | loc: pouliční lampa
  EN TS: Orange streetlights, so cozy.
  cz TS: Oranžové pouliční lampy, taková pohoda.
  EN FS: Blue streetlights, so cozy.
  cz FS: Modré pouliční lampy, taková pohoda.
  EN TP: a row of streetlights
  cz TP: řada pouličních lamp
  EN FP: a broken streetlight
  cz FP: rozbitá pouliční lampa
5352 | frustration (noun): the feeling of being blocked from your goals | loc: frustrace
  EN TS: Her frustration is at 1000 %.
  cz TS: Její frustrace je na 1000 %.
  EN FS: Her frustration is at 0 %.
  cz FS: Její frustrace je na 0 %.
  EN TP: frustration at a laptop
  cz TP: frustrace u notebooku
  EN FP: frustration at a teacher
  cz FP: frustrace z učitele
5353 | paperwork (noun): work that means handling forms and papers | loc: papírování
  EN TS: The paperwork is winning.
  cz TS: Papírování vyhrává.
  EN FS: The paperwork is shrinking.
  cz FS: Papírování ubývá.
  EN TP: towers of paperwork
  cz TP: věže papírování
  EN FP: paperwork on a laptop
  cz FP: papírování na notebooku
5354 | class (noun): teaching given as a series of lessons | loc: třída
  EN TS: The class follows her well.
  cz TS: Třída ji dobře sleduje.
  EN FS: The class follows him well.
  cz FS: Třída ho dobře sleduje.
  EN TP: a class in the park
  cz TP: třída v parku
  EN FP: a class in a school
  cz FP: třída ve škole
5355 | trainer (noun): someone who trains other people or animals | loc: trenér
  EN TS: Even the cat copies the trainer!
  cz TS: I kočka napodobuje trenéra!
  EN FS: Even the dog copies the trainer!
  cz FS: I pes napodobuje trenéra!
  EN TP: a trainer in the park
  cz TP: trenér v parku
  EN FP: a dog trainer with treats
  cz FP: cvičitel psů s pamlsky
5356 | yoga (noun): calm stretching poses with slow breathing | loc: jóga
  EN TS: Rooftop yoga at sunset: goals.
  cz TS: Jóga na střeše při západu slunce? Tohle chci.
  EN FS: Beach yoga at sunset: goals.
  cz FS: Jóga na pláži při západu slunce? Tohle chci.
  EN TP: yoga on a rooftop
  cz TP: jóga na střeše
  EN FP: yoga in a gym class
  cz FP: jóga v posilovně
5357 | fancy (adjective): decorated, expensive-looking and not plain | loc: nóbl
  EN TS: The dog has a fancier stroller than most babies.
  cz TS: Pes má nóblovější kočárek než většina miminek.
  EN FS: The cat has a fancier stroller than most babies.
  cz FS: Kočka má nóblovější kočárek než většina miminek.
  EN TP: a fancy chrome stroller
  cz TP: nóbl chromovaný kočárek
  EN FP: a fancy dress party
  cz FP: nóbl kostýmní večírek
5358 | peek (verb): to take a quick secret look from hiding | loc: kouknout | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is peeking through books.
  cz TS: Kouká mezi knihami.
  EN FS: She is peeking through blinds.
  cz FS: Kouká mezi žaluziemi.
  EN TP: peeking through a gap
  cz TP: koukat škvírou
  EN FP: peeking inside a book
  cz FP: koukat do knihy
5359 | hippo (noun): a very big grey animal that lives in rivers | loc: hroch
  EN TS: The hippo is hiding from her.
  cz TS: Hroch se před ní schovává.
  EN FS: The duck is hiding from her.
  cz FS: Kachna se před ní schovává.
  EN TP: a hippo in the river
  cz TP: hroch v řece
  EN FP: a hippo on the jetty
  cz FP: hroch na molu
5360 | metro (noun): an electric railway that runs below the ground | loc: metro
  EN TS: The metro is "a bit" busy.
  cz TS: Metro je „trochu" plné.
  EN FS: The metro is "a bit" empty.
  cz FS: Metro je „trochu" prázdné.
  EN TP: a packed metro station
  cz TP: narvaná stanice metra
  EN FP: an empty metro station
  cz FP: prázdná stanice metra
5361 | easy (adjective): needing little effort, not difficult | loc: snadný
  EN TS: Six bags are "easy" to push.
  cz TS: Tlačit šest tašek je „snadné".
  EN FS: Six boxes are "easy" to push.
  cz FS: Tlačit šest krabic je „snadné".
  EN TP: not an easy trip
  cz TP: ne zrovna snadná cesta
  EN FP: not an easy exam
  cz FP: ne zrovna snadná zkouška
5362 | silly (adjective): foolish in a funny, ludicrous way | loc: praštěný
  EN TS: The silliest glasses on the island!
  cz TS: Nejpraštěnější brýle na ostrově!
  EN FS: The silliest hat on the island!
  cz FS: Nejpraštěnější klobouk na ostrově!
  EN TP: silly heart sunglasses
  cz TP: praštěné brýle se srdíčky
  EN FP: silly heart balloons
  cz FP: praštěné balonky se srdíčky
5363 | aid (verb): to give help to someone | loc: pomáhat
  EN TS: They are aiding the runner.
  cz TS: Pomáhají běžci.
  EN FS: They are aiding the cyclist.
  cz FS: Pomáhají cyklistovi.
  EN TP: aiding an exhausted runner
  cz TP: pomáhat vyčerpanému běžci
  EN FP: aiding a lost tourist
  cz FP: pomáhat ztracenému turistovi
5364 | assist (verb): to give someone help with something | loc: asistovat
  EN TS: Two heroes are assisting her!
  cz TS: Asistují jí dva hrdinové!
  EN FS: Two nurses are assisting her!
  cz FS: Asistují jí dvě zdravotní sestry!
  EN TP: assisting a tired runner
  cz TP: asistovat unavené běžkyni
  EN FP: assisting a tired driver
  cz FP: asistovat unavenému řidiči
5365 | weapon (noun): an instrument used in fighting or hunting | loc: zbraň
  EN TS: He is lowering his weapon.
  cz TS: Sklání zbraň.
  EN FS: He is cleaning his weapon.
  cz FS: Čistí zbraň.
  EN TP: lowering a paintball weapon
  cz TP: sklánění paintballové zbraně
  EN FP: loading a paintball weapon
  cz FP: nabíjení paintballové zbraně
5366 | surrender (verb): to give up to the power of another | loc: vzdát se
  EN TS: He is surrendering!
  cz TS: Vzdává se!
  EN FS: He is attacking!
  cz FS: Útočí!
  EN TP: surrendering with raised hands
  cz TP: vzdává se s rukama nahoře
  EN FP: surrendering his passport
  cz FP: odevzdává pas
5367 | stuff (verb): to cram something into a tight space | loc: nacpat
  EN TS: She is stuffing her mouth!
  cz TS: Nacpává si pusu!
  EN FS: She is stuffing her bag!
  cz FS: Nacpává si tašku!
  EN TP: stuffing in a cheeseburger
  cz TP: nacpat do sebe cheeseburger
  EN FP: stuffing a turkey
  cz FP: plnit krocana
5368 | suffer (verb): to be subjected to something bad | loc: trpět
  EN TS: The heat makes them suffer.
  cz TS: Trpí kvůli horku.
  EN FS: The cold makes them suffer.
  cz FS: Trpí kvůli zimě.
  EN TP: suffering in the heat
  cz TP: trpět v horku
  EN FP: suffering from a cold
  cz FP: trpět nachlazením
5369 | tough (adjective): not given to gentleness or soft feelings | loc: tvrdý
  EN TS: Tough boxer, soaked in sweat.
  cz TS: Tvrdý boxer, zalitý potem.
  EN FS: Tough boxer, soaked in rain.
  cz FS: Tvrdý boxer, zalitý deštěm.
  EN TP: a tough young boxer
  cz TP: tvrdý mladý boxer
  EN FP: a tough piece of meat
  cz FP: tvrdý kus masa
5370 | canoe (noun): a narrow boat you move with a paddle | loc: kánoe
  EN TS: He is paddling a yellow canoe.
  cz TS: Pádluje na žluté kánoi.
  EN FS: He is paddling a red canoe.
  cz FS: Pádluje na červené kánoi.
  EN TP: paddling a yellow canoe
  cz TP: pádlování na žluté kánoi
  EN FP: carrying a canoe home
  cz FP: nesení kánoe domů
5371 | garland (noun): a chain of flowers worn or hung as decoration | loc: girlanda
  EN TS: They look cool in flower garlands.
  cz TS: V květinových girlandách vypadají super.
  EN FS: They look cool in paper crowns.
  cz FS: V papírových korunách vypadají super.
  EN TP: wearing flower garlands
  cz TP: s květinovými girlandami
  EN FP: hanging a garland indoors
  cz FP: věšení girlandy doma
5372 | broom (noun): a brush with a long handle for sweeping floors | loc: koště
  EN TS: His broom is pushing leaves.
  cz TS: Jeho koště shrnuje listí.
  EN FS: His broom is pushing snow.
  cz FS: Jeho koště shrnuje sníh.
  EN TP: a broom and dry leaves
  cz TP: koště a suché listí
  EN FP: a broom in the kitchen
  cz FP: koště v kuchyni
5373 | expand (verb): to become larger in size or volume | loc: zvětšovat se
  EN TS: Everything is expanding!
  cz TS: Všechno se zvětšuje!
  EN FS: Everything is shrinking!
  cz FS: Všechno se zmenšuje!
  EN TP: a bouncy castle expanding
  cz TP: skákací hrad se zvětšuje
  EN FP: a business expanding abroad
  cz FP: firma expandující do zahraničí
5374 | shallow (adjective): not deep, lacking much depth | loc: mělký
  EN TS: The water is a bit shallow.
  cz TS: Voda je trochu mělká.
  EN FS: The water is a bit deep.
  cz FS: Voda je trochu hluboká.
  EN TP: swimming in shallow water
  cz TP: plavání v mělké vodě
  EN FP: a shallow soup bowl
  cz FP: mělká miska na polévku
5375 | swing (verb): to move something in a curve or arc to hit | loc: švihnout | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is swinging like a pro.
  cz TS: Švihá jako profík.
  EN FS: She is swimming like a pro.
  cz FS: Plave jako profík.
  EN TP: swinging a golf club
  cz TP: švihnout golfovou holí
  EN FP: swinging a baseball bat
  cz FP: švihnout baseballovou pálkou
5376 | switch (noun): a device that turns the electricity on or off | loc: vypínač
  EN TS: He pressed the switch. Light!
  cz TS: Zmáčkl vypínač. Světlo!
  EN FS: He kicked the switch. Light!
  cz FS: Kopl do vypínače. Světlo!
  EN TP: pressing a light switch
  cz TP: mačkání vypínače světla
  EN FP: a switch on a railway
  cz FP: výhybka na železnici
5377 | collect (verb): to gather things together into one place | loc: sbírat
  EN TS: She collected the plates.
  cz TS: Sesbírala talíře.
  EN FS: She collected the apples.
  cz FS: Sesbírala jablka.
  EN TP: collected dirty plates
  cz TP: sesbírané špinavé talíře
  EN FP: collecting red apples
  cz FP: sbírání červených jablek
5378 | set (verb): to put something down in a certain place | loc: položit | checker: word_missing? | translator note: "položit" does not fit "set the table"; used prostírat
  EN TS: She is setting the table.
  cz TS: Prostírá stůl.
  EN FS: She is setting the alarm.
  cz FS: Nastavuje budík.
  EN TP: to set the table
  cz TP: prostřít stůl
  EN FP: to set an alarm
  cz FP: nastavit budík
5379 | alter (verb): to change something to make it different | loc: upravit
  EN TS: The tailor altered the jacket.
  cz TS: Krejčí upravil sako.
  EN FS: The tailor altered the shirt.
  cz FS: Krejčí upravil košili.
  EN TP: altering a navy jacket
  cz TP: úprava tmavomodrého saka
  EN FP: altering the travel plans
  cz FP: úprava cestovních plánů
5380 | take (verb): to get something into your hands | loc: vzít | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He even took the box!
  cz TS: Dokonce vzal i tu krabici!
  EN FS: She even took the box!
  cz FS: Dokonce vzala i tu krabici!
  EN TP: taking stuff from a box
  cz TP: brát věci z krabice
  EN FP: taking a box to school
  cz FP: brát krabici do školy
5381 | conversation (noun): an informal exchange of ideas by speaking | loc: konverzace
  EN TS: Coffee and a big conversation.
  cz TS: Káva a pořádná konverzace.
  EN FS: Beer and a big conversation.
  cz FS: Pivo a pořádná konverzace.
  EN TP: a conversation over coffee
  cz TP: konverzace u kávy
  EN FP: a conversation by email
  cz FP: konverzace přes e-mail
5382 | discuss (verb): to talk about something and examine it | loc: diskutovat
  EN TS: Everyone at the table is discussing it at once!
  cz TS: Všichni u stolu o tom diskutují naráz!
  EN FS: Everyone on the bus is discussing it at once!
  cz FS: Všichni v autobuse o tom diskutují naráz!
  EN TP: discussing at a cafe table
  cz TP: diskutovat u stolku v kavárně
  EN FP: discussing it by phone
  cz FP: diskutovat po telefonu
5383 | avenue (noun): a wide street in a town | loc: bulvár
  EN TS: So many taxis on the avenue!
  cz TS: Tolik taxíků na bulváru!
  EN FS: So many buses on the avenue!
  cz FS: Tolik autobusů na bulváru!
  EN TP: a wide avenue of taxis
  cz TP: široký bulvár plný taxíků
  EN FP: an avenue of old trees
  cz FP: bulvár lemovaný stromy
5384 | champion (noun): someone who won first place in a competition | loc: šampion
  EN TS: The champions are going wild.
  cz TS: Šampioni úplně šílí.
  EN FS: The champions are going home.
  cz FS: Šampioni jdou domů.
  EN TP: champions in striped shirts
  cz TP: šampioni v pruhovaných dresech
  EN FP: a champion on a podium
  cz FP: šampion na stupních vítězů
5385 | win (noun): a victory in a race or a competition | loc: vítězství
  EN TS: The rally ends in a win.
  cz TS: Výměna končí vítězstvím.
  EN FS: The rally ends in a loss.
  cz FS: Výměna končí prohrou.
  EN TP: a beach volleyball win
  cz TP: vítězství v plážovém volejbale
  EN FP: a win at cards
  cz FP: vítězství v kartách
5386 | tear (verb): to separate something by pulling it apart | loc: trhat
  EN TS: She is tearing the contract.
  cz TS: Trhá smlouvu.
  EN FS: She is tearing the curtains.
  cz FS: Trhá záclony.
  EN TP: tearing a contract in half
  cz TP: roztrhnout smlouvu napůl
  EN FP: tearing pages from a book
  cz FP: vytrhávat stránky z knihy
5387 | sorrow (noun): deep sadness, especially about a loss | loc: žal
  EN TS: They share their sorrow.
  cz TS: Sdílejí svůj žal.
  EN FS: They share their pizza.
  cz FS: Sdílejí svou pizzu.
  EN TP: sorrow on a sofa
  cz TP: žal na gauči
  EN FP: sorrow at a funeral
  cz FP: žal na pohřbu
5388 | packet (noun): things wrapped together in one package | loc: balíček
  EN TS: She won the packet of crisps!
  cz TS: Vyhrála balíček chipsů!
  EN FS: She won the packet of sweets!
  cz FS: Vyhrála balíček bonbonů!
  EN TP: grabbing a packet of crisps
  cz TP: chňapnout balíček chipsů
  EN FP: a packet of seeds
  cz FP: balíček semínek
5389 | dodge (verb): to make a sudden move to avoid something | loc: uhnout | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is dodging her like Messi.
  cz TS: On jí uhýbá jak Messi.
  EN FS: She is dodging him like Messi.
  cz FS: Ona mu uhýbá jak Messi.
  EN TP: dodging her hands
  cz TP: uhýbat jejím rukám
  EN FP: dodging a football
  cz FP: uhnout fotbalovému míči
5390 | youth (noun): a young person, especially a young man or boy | loc: mladík
  EN TS: A youth is skating, so cool.
  cz TS: Mladík jezdí na skejtu, fakt cool.
  EN FS: A youth is cycling, so cool.
  cz FS: Mladík jezdí na kole, fakt cool.
  EN TP: a youth on a skateboard
  cz TP: mladík na skejtu
  EN FP: a youth on a bicycle
  cz FP: mladík na kole
5391 | stare (verb): to look at something for a long time | loc: zírat
  EN TS: Nice sunset, they're staring at a phone.
  cz TS: Krásný západ slunce, a oni zírají do mobilu.
  EN FS: Nice sunset, they're staring at a book.
  cz FS: Krásný západ slunce, a oni zírají do knížky.
  EN TP: staring at a phone
  cz TP: zírat do mobilu
  EN FP: staring at the sunset
  cz FP: zírat na západ slunce
5392 | terror (noun): an overwhelming feeling of fear and worry | loc: hrůza
  EN TS: They're screaming in terror!
  cz TS: Křičí hrůzou!
  EN FS: They're screaming in a car!
  cz FS: Křičí v autě!
  EN TP: screaming in terror
  cz TP: křik hrůzou
  EN FP: screaming with joy
  cz FP: křik radostí
5393 | calm (noun): staying steady in your mind under stress | loc: klid
  EN TS: The T-rex stole her calm.
  cz TS: Tyranosaurus jí vzal klid.
  EN FS: The dog stole her calm.
  cz FS: Pes jí vzal klid.
  EN TP: losing her calm
  cz TP: přichází o klid
  EN FP: keeping her calm
  cz FP: udržuje si klid
5394 | claim (verb): to demand something as your own property | loc: nárokovat si
  EN TS: Someone claimed it first!
  cz TS: Někdo si to nárokoval jako první!
  EN FS: Nobody claimed it first!
  cz FS: Nikdo si to nenárokoval jako první!
  EN TP: claiming the frozen land
  cz TP: nárokovat si zamrzlou zemi
  EN FP: claiming a lost bag
  cz FP: nárokovat si ztracenou tašku
5395 | ranch (noun): a large farm where cattle are raised | loc: ranč
  EN TS: A ranch hand is riding along the fence.
  cz TS: Pomocník z ranče jede podél plotu.
  EN FS: A ranch hand is riding along the river.
  cz FS: Pomocník z ranče jede podél řeky.
  EN TP: a ranch hand riding
  cz TP: jezdec z ranče
  EN FP: a ranch full of cattle
  cz FP: ranč plný dobytka
5396 | mark (verb): to designate a place with a mark | loc: označit
  EN TS: Orange flags mark the line.
  cz TS: Oranžové vlajky označují čáru.
  EN FS: Blue flags mark the line.
  cz FS: Modré vlajky označují čáru.
  EN TP: marking a line with flags
  cz TP: označování čáry vlajkami
  EN FP: marking an exam paper
  cz FP: opravování písemky
5397 | mighty (adjective): showing great strength or force | loc: mohutný
  EN TS: One mighty wave, four calm seagulls.
  cz TS: Jedna mohutná vlna, čtyři klidní rackové.
  EN FS: One mighty wave, four calm ducks.
  cz FS: Jedna mohutná vlna, čtyři klidné kachny.
  EN TP: a mighty wave breaking
  cz TP: lámající se mohutná vlna
  EN FP: a mighty king
  cz FP: mohutný král
5398 | chain (noun): a series of things linked together | loc: řetěz
  EN TS: People form a human chain.
  cz TS: Lidé tvoří lidský řetěz.
  EN FS: People form a human tower.
  cz FS: Lidé tvoří lidskou věž.
  EN TP: a human chain around Earth
  cz TP: lidský řetěz kolem Země
  EN FP: a gold chain necklace
  cz FP: zlatý řetízek na krk
5399 | play (noun): a story that actors perform on a stage | loc: divadelní hra
  EN TS: Two actors are in a play.
  cz TS: Dva herci hrají v divadelní hře.
  EN FS: Two dogs are in a play.
  cz FS: Dva psi hrají v divadelní hře.
  EN TP: a play in a theatre
  cz TP: divadelní hra v divadle
  EN FP: a play at school
  cz FP: divadelní hra ve škole
5400 | opera (noun): a drama sung to music with an orchestra | loc: opera
  EN TS: She is at the opera in style.
  cz TS: Vyrazila do opery ve stylu.
  EN FS: She is at the cinema in style.
  cz FS: Vyrazila do kina ve stylu.
  EN TP: a night at the opera
  cz TP: večer v opeře
  EN FP: an opera singer
  cz FP: operní zpěvačka
5401 | wonder (verb): to want to know something | loc: přemýšlet
  EN TS: Everyone is wondering.
  cz TS: Všichni přemýšlejí.
  EN FS: Everyone is sleeping.
  cz FS: Všichni spí.
  EN TP: wondering about a problem
  cz TP: přemýšlení o problému
  EN FP: wondering about the weather
  cz FP: přemýšlení o počasí
5402 | throat (noun): the passage to your stomach and lungs | loc: krk
  EN TS: She is checking his throat.
  cz TS: Kontroluje mu krk.
  EN FS: She is checking his ears.
  cz FS: Kontroluje mu uši.
  EN TP: a check of his throat
  cz TP: prohlídka krku
  EN FP: a scarf around his throat
  cz FP: šála kolem krku
5403 | time (noun): what clocks measure, in hours and minutes | loc: čas
  EN TS: She is checking the time.
  cz TS: Kontroluje čas.
  EN FS: She is checking the map.
  cz FS: Kontroluje mapu.
  EN TP: checking the time
  cz TP: kontrola času
  EN FP: wasting time
  cz FP: ztráta času
5404 | greedy (adjective): wanting far more money than you need | loc: chamtivý
  EN TS: He is so greedy with toast!
  cz TS: Je tak chamtivý na toasty!
  EN FS: He is so greedy with cake!
  cz FS: Je tak chamtivý na dort!
  EN TP: a greedy toast eater
  cz TP: chamtivý jedlík toastů
  EN FP: a greedy cake eater
  cz FP: chamtivý jedlík dortů
5405 | toddler (noun): a very small child, only a year or two old | loc: batole
  EN TS: The toddler is walking!
  cz TS: Batole chodí!
  EN FS: The toddler is crawling!
  cz FS: Batole leze!
  EN TP: a toddler's first steps
  cz TP: první krůčky batolete
  EN FP: a toddler's first words
  cz FP: první slůvka batolete
5406 | toe (noun): one of the five small end parts of the foot | loc: prst u nohy
  EN TS: Her toes are next to a shell.
  cz TS: Její prsty u nohou jsou vedle mušle.
  EN FS: Her toes are next to a crab.
  cz FS: Její prsty u nohou jsou vedle kraba.
  EN TP: toes spread in the sand
  cz TP: roztažené prsty u nohou v písku
  EN FP: toes in a flip-flop
  cz FP: prsty u nohou v žabce
5407 | toilet (noun): the bathroom fixture you sit on to pee | loc: záchod
  EN TS: Everyone needs the toilet now.
  cz TS: Všichni teď nutně potřebují na záchod.
  EN FS: Everyone needs the exit now.
  cz FS: Všichni teď nutně potřebují k východu.
  EN TP: a queue for the toilet
  cz TP: fronta na záchod
  EN FP: cleaning the toilet
  cz FP: čištění záchodu
5408 | kit (noun): a case holding a set of things you need | loc: sada
  EN TS: The kit solved the chair problem.
  cz TS: Sada vyřešila problém se židlí.
  EN FS: The kit solved the table problem.
  cz FS: Sada vyřešila problém se stolem.
  EN TP: a red tool kit
  cz TP: červená sada nářadí
  EN FP: a first aid kit
  cz FP: sada první pomoci
5409 | tooth (noun): one of the hard white parts in your jaws | loc: zub
  EN TS: She is showing her teeth.
  cz TS: Ukazuje zuby.
  EN FS: She is showing her tongue.
  cz FS: Ukazuje jazyk.
  EN TP: front teeth up close
  cz TP: přední zuby zblízka
  EN FP: a missing front tooth
  cz FP: chybějící přední zub
5410 | toothbrush (noun): a small brush used for cleaning the teeth | loc: zubní kartáček
  EN TS: He has a green toothbrush.
  cz TS: Má zelený zubní kartáček.
  EN FS: He has a blue toothbrush.
  cz FS: Má modrý zubní kartáček.
  EN TP: a green toothbrush
  cz TP: zelený zubní kartáček
  EN FP: an electric toothbrush
  cz FP: elektrický zubní kartáček
5411 | swirl (noun): a curling, spiral shape | loc: vír | checker: word_missing? | translator note: "vír" unnatural for a toothpaste swirl; used spirálka
  EN TS: He gets a smear, she gets swirls.
  cz TS: On dostane šmouhu, ona spirálky.
  EN FS: He gets swirls, she gets a smear.
  cz FS: On dostane spirálky, ona šmouhu.
  EN TP: a swirl of toothpaste
  cz TP: spirálka zubní pasty
  EN FP: a swirl of whipped cream
  cz FP: spirálka šlehačky
5412 | pillar (noun): a tall upright post of stone | loc: sloup
  EN TS: Greek pillars, fluted marble.
  cz TS: Řecké sloupy, kanelovaný mramor.
  EN FS: Greek pillars, pink marble.
  cz FS: Řecké sloupy, růžový mramor.
  EN TP: huge fluted marble pillars
  cz TP: obří kanelované mramorové sloupy
  EN FP: a car park pillar
  cz FP: sloup v parkovacím domě
5413 | hopeless (adjective): without hope that things can get better | loc: beznadějný
  EN TS: Cars everywhere. Hopeless!
  cz TS: Všude auta. Beznadějné!
  EN FS: Bikes everywhere. Hopeless!
  cz FS: Všude kola. Beznadějné!
  EN TP: a hopeless traffic jam
  cz TP: beznadějná zácpa
  EN FP: a hopeless football team
  cz FP: beznadějný fotbalový tým
5414 | rail (noun): a barrier made of a horizontal bar on supports | loc: zábradlí
  EN TS: He is holding the metal rail.
  cz TS: Drží se kovového zábradlí.
  EN FS: He is holding the metal gate.
  cz FS: Drží se kovové brány.
  EN TP: the rail of a footbridge
  cz TP: zábradlí lávky
  EN FP: a train on the rail
  cz FP: vlak na kolejích
5415 | red (adjective): the color at the end of the spectrum | loc: červený
  EN TS: He is waiting at a red light.
  cz TS: Čeká na červenou.
  EN FS: He is waiting at a bus stop.
  cz FS: Čeká na zastávce.
  EN TP: a red traffic light
  cz TP: červené světlo na semaforu
  EN FP: a red stop sign
  cz FP: červená stopka
5416 | locomotive (noun): the engine at the front that pulls a train | loc: lokomotiva
  EN TS: She loves that locomotive.
  cz TS: Tu lokomotivu miluje.
  EN FS: She loves that helicopter.
  cz FS: Tu helikoptéru miluje.
  EN TP: an orange electric locomotive
  cz TP: oranžová elektrická lokomotiva
  EN FP: an orange steam locomotive
  cz FP: oranžová parní lokomotiva
5417 | depot (noun): a place where trams or buses are kept | loc: depo
  EN TS: The tram ends up in the depot.
  cz TS: Tramvaj skončí v depu.
  EN FS: The tram ends up in a museum.
  cz FS: Tramvaj skončí v muzeu.
  EN TP: trams in a depot
  cz TP: tramvaje v depu
  EN FP: buses in a depot
  cz FP: autobusy v depu
5418 | interior (noun): the space that is inside of something | loc: interiér
  EN TS: The interior is all wood.
  cz TS: Interiér je celý ze dřeva.
  EN FS: The interior is all plastic.
  cz FS: Interiér je celý z plastu.
  EN TP: a wooden tram interior
  cz TP: dřevěný interiér tramvaje
  EN FP: a modern car interior
  cz FP: moderní interiér auta
5419 | transfer (noun): moving something from one place to another | loc: přesun
  EN TS: He makes every transfer.
  cz TS: Stihne každý přesun.
  EN FS: He misses every transfer.
  cz FS: Zmešká každý přesun.
  EN TP: a transfer to a ferry
  cz TP: přesun na trajekt
  EN FP: a bank transfer
  cz FP: bankovní převod
5420 | vessel (noun): a craft built for travel on water | loc: plavidlo
  EN TS: He is boarding a white vessel.
  cz TS: Nastupuje na bílé plavidlo.
  EN FS: He is boarding a red vessel.
  cz FS: Nastupuje na červené plavidlo.
  EN TP: a small passenger vessel
  cz TP: malé osobní plavidlo
  EN FP: a huge cargo vessel
  cz FP: obří nákladní plavidlo
5421 | garbage (noun): food and waste thrown out of a kitchen | loc: odpadky
  EN TS: The garbage is everywhere!
  cz TS: Odpadky jsou všude!
  EN FS: The flowers are everywhere!
  cz FS: Květiny jsou všude!
  EN TP: a bin full of garbage
  cz TP: koš plný odpadků
  EN FP: a bin full of flowers
  cz FP: koš plný květin
5422 | recycling (noun): making new products from used materials | loc: recyklace
  EN TS: Recycling like LeBron.
  cz TS: Recyklace jak LeBron.
  EN FS: Recycling like Messi.
  cz FS: Recyklace jak Messi.
  EN TP: throwing into recycling bins
  cz TP: házení do košů na recyklaci
  EN FP: recycling old clothes
  cz FP: recyklace starého oblečení
5423 | worldwide (adjective): spread out across the entire world | loc: celosvětový
  EN TS: His rucksack travels worldwide.
  cz TS: Jeho batoh je na celosvětovém turné.
  EN FS: His rucksack stays in one city.
  cz FS: Jeho batoh zůstává v jednom městě.
  EN TP: travelling worldwide
  cz TP: celosvětové cestování
  EN FP: a worldwide phone network
  cz FP: celosvětová telefonní síť
5424 | treaty (noun): a written agreement between two countries | loc: smlouva
  EN TS: They signed the treaty.
  cz TS: Podepsali smlouvu.
  EN FS: They tore up the treaty.
  cz FS: Roztrhali smlouvu.
  EN TP: shaking hands on a treaty
  cz TP: podání ruky nad smlouvou
  EN FP: tearing up a treaty
  cz FP: trhání smlouvy
5425 | deal (noun): a single instance of buying or selling | loc: obchod
  EN TS: The deal is done.
  cz TS: Obchod je domluvený.
  EN FS: The deal is off.
  cz FS: Obchod je zrušený.
  EN TP: signing a big deal
  cz TP: podpis velkého obchodu
  EN FP: a deal at the market
  cz FP: obchod na trhu
5426 | delegation (noun): a group of representatives sent somewhere | loc: delegace
  EN TS: Both delegations have a deal.
  cz TS: Obě delegace mají dohodu.
  EN FS: No delegation has a deal.
  cz FS: Žádná delegace nemá dohodu.
  EN TP: two delegations meeting
  cz TP: setkání dvou delegací
  EN FP: a delegation at the airport
  cz FP: delegace na letišti
5427 | seal (noun): a wax fastener that is soft when warm | loc: pečeť
  EN TS: The envelope has a red seal.
  cz TS: Obálka má červenou pečeť.
  EN FS: The envelope has a blue seal.
  cz FS: Obálka má modrou pečeť.
  EN TP: a red wax seal
  cz TP: červená vosková pečeť
  EN FP: a seal on the beach
  cz FP: tuleň na pláži
5428 | freight (noun): goods carried by a big truck or ship | loc: náklad
  EN TS: The truck is bringing freight.
  cz TS: Náklaďák veze náklad.
  EN FS: The train is bringing freight.
  cz FS: Vlak veze náklad.
  EN TP: freight on a big truck
  cz TP: náklad na velkém kamionu
  EN FP: freight on a ship
  cz FP: náklad na lodi
5429 | trust (verb): to have confidence in other people | loc: důvěřovat
  EN TS: She trusts them, eyes closed.
  cz TS: Důvěřuje jim, se zavřenýma očima.
  EN FS: She trusts them, eyes open.
  cz FS: Důvěřuje jim, s otevřenýma očima.
  EN TP: trusting the team to catch
  cz TP: důvěřovat týmu, že chytí
  EN FP: trusting a stranger online
  cz FP: důvěřovat cizinci na internetu
5430 | fast (adjective): moving or able to move very quickly | loc: rychlý
  EN TS: She is fast on her road bike.
  cz TS: Na silničce je rychlá.
  EN FS: She is fast on her skateboard.
  cz FS: Na skejtu je rychlá.
  EN TP: a fast ride through tunnels
  cz TP: rychlá jízda tunely
  EN FP: a fast ride through town
  cz FP: rychlá jízda městem
5431 | balloon (noun): a big bag filled with hot air that carries people | loc: balon
  EN TS: She is flying in a balloon.
  cz TS: Letí v balonu.
  EN FS: She is flying in a plane.
  cz FS: Letí v letadle.
  EN TP: a balloon over rocks
  cz TP: balon nad skalami
  EN FP: a party balloon
  cz FP: balonek na párty
5432 | trick (verb): to deceive somebody for fun | loc: napálit | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is tricking the poor guy!
  cz TS: Napaluje toho chudáka!
  EN FS: He is tricking the poor dog!
  cz FS: Napaluje toho chudáka psa!
  EN TP: tricking a customer
  cz TP: napálit zákazníka
  EN FP: tricking a teacher
  cz FP: napálit učitele
5433 | turn on (verb): to make something work by flipping a switch | loc: zapnout | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is turning on the lights.
  cz TS: Zapíná světla.
  EN FS: He is turning off the lights.
  cz FS: Vypíná světla.
  EN TP: to turn on fairy lights
  cz TP: zapnout světelný řetěz
  EN FP: to turn on the TV
  cz FP: zapnout televizi
5434 | electricity (noun): the energy made by moving electrons | loc: elektřina
  EN TS: She is wasting electricity!
  cz TS: Plýtvá elektřinou!
  EN FS: She is wasting paper!
  cz FS: Plýtvá papírem!
  EN TP: using lots of electricity
  cz TP: spotřeba spousty elektřiny
  EN FP: electricity from solar panels
  cz FP: elektřina ze solárních panelů
5435 | alike (adjective): having the same or similar features | loc: podobný
  EN TS: OMG, they dress exactly alike.
  cz TS: Páni, oblékají se úplně podobně.
  EN FS: OMG, they dress differently.
  cz FS: Páni, oblékají se úplně jinak.
  EN TP: dressed exactly alike
  cz TP: oblečení úplně podobně
  EN FP: alike in school uniforms
  cz FP: podobní ve školních uniformách
5436 | twist (verb): to move in a twisting motion | loc: kroutit
  EN TS: The team is twisting dough.
  cz TS: Tým kroutí těsto.
  EN FS: The team is cutting dough.
  cz FS: Tým krájí těsto.
  EN TP: twisting a rope of dough
  cz TP: kroucení provazu z těsta
  EN FP: twisting a rope of wool
  cz FP: kroucení provazu z vlny
5437 | courtyard (noun): an open space with buildings all around it | loc: nádvoří
  EN TS: Party in the courtyard!
  cz TS: Párty na nádvoří!
  EN FS: Party in the kitchen!
  cz FS: Párty v kuchyni!
  EN TP: a courtyard party with lights
  cz TP: párty na nádvoří se světýlky
  EN FP: a school courtyard at break
  cz FP: školní nádvoří o přestávce
5438 | filling (noun): any material that fills a space or container | loc: náplň
  EN TS: A bowl of red filling.
  cz TS: Miska červené náplně.
  EN FS: A bowl of green filling.
  cz FS: Miska zelené náplně.
  EN TP: red fruit filling
  cz TP: červená ovocná náplň
  EN FP: a filling at the dentist
  cz FP: plomba u zubaře
5439 | grey (adjective): a color between white and black | loc: šedý
  EN TS: Four men, one grey umbrella!
  cz TS: Čtyři chlapi, jeden šedý deštník!
  EN FS: Four men, one red umbrella!
  cz FS: Čtyři chlapi, jeden červený deštník!
  EN TP: a grey rainy city
  cz TP: šedé deštivé město
  EN FP: a grey winter coat
  cz FP: šedý zimní kabát
5440 | nephew (noun): the son of your brother or sister | loc: synovec
  EN TS: Kite day with his nephew.
  cz TS: Den s draky se synovcem.
  EN FS: Kite day with his dog.
  cz FS: Den s draky se psem.
  EN TP: flying kites with a nephew
  cz TP: pouštění draků se synovcem
  EN FP: fishing with a nephew
  cz FP: rybaření se synovcem
5441 | uncle (noun): the brother of your father or mother | loc: strýc
  EN TS: The uncle let her win.
  cz TS: Strýc ji nechal vyhrát.
  EN FS: The uncle let him win.
  cz FS: Strýc ho nechal vyhrát.
  EN TP: arm-wrestling with an uncle
  cz TP: páka se strýcem
  EN FP: boxing with an uncle
  cz FP: box se strýcem
5442 | sleeve (noun): the part of a garment that covers the arm | loc: rukáv
  EN TS: He is fighting every sleeve!
  cz TS: Bojuje s každým rukávem!
  EN FS: He is fighting every zip!
  cz FS: Bojuje s každým zipem!
  EN TP: pulling arms out of sleeves
  cz TP: vytahování rukou z rukávů
  EN FP: rolling up the sleeves
  cz FP: vyhrnování rukávů
5443 | solidarity (noun): a union of purposes among members of a group | loc: solidarita
  EN TS: Solidarity fills the street.
  cz TS: Ulici naplňuje solidarita.
  EN FS: Solidarity fills the stadium.
  cz FS: Stadion naplňuje solidarita.
  EN TP: a chain of solidarity
  cz TP: řetěz solidarity
  EN FP: a chain of shops
  cz FP: řetězec obchodů
5444 | cooperate (verb): to work together on a common project | loc: spolupracovat
  EN TS: They're cooperating on a map.
  cz TS: Spolupracují na mapě.
  EN FS: They're cooperating on a car.
  cz FS: Spolupracují na autě.
  EN TP: cooperating on a puzzle
  cz TP: spolupracovat na puzzle
  EN FP: cooperating with the police
  cz FP: spolupracovat s policií
5445 | useless (adjective): having no beneficial use, not working usefully | loc: nepoužitelný
  EN TS: His umbrella is useless now.
  cz TS: Jeho deštník je teď nepoužitelný.
  EN FS: His briefcase is useless now.
  cz FS: Jeho aktovka je teď nepoužitelná.
  EN TP: a useless umbrella
  cz TP: nepoužitelný deštník
  EN FP: a useless umbrella in sunshine
  cz FP: nepoužitelný deštník za slunce
5446 | misty (adjective): covered in thin fog that hides things | loc: mlhavý
  EN TS: The hills are misty.
  cz TS: Kopce jsou mlhavé.
  EN FS: The hills are sunny.
  cz FS: Kopce jsou slunné.
  EN TP: misty hills over a lake
  cz TP: mlhavé kopce nad jezerem
  EN FP: misty eyes at a wedding
  cz FP: zamžené oči na svatbě
5447 | remote (adjective): located far away in space | loc: odlehlý
  EN TS: This road is very remote.
  cz TS: Tahle silnice je hodně odlehlá.
  EN FS: This road is very busy.
  cz FS: Tahle silnice je hodně rušná.
  EN TP: a remote desert road
  cz TP: odlehlá pouštní silnice
  EN FP: a remote control
  cz FP: dálkové ovládání
5448 | billboard (noun): a huge board above a street where ads are posted | loc: billboard
  EN TS: Billboards on every wall!
  cz TS: Billboardy na každé zdi!
  EN FS: Paintings on every wall!
  cz FS: Obrazy na každé zdi!
  EN TP: huge lit billboards
  cz TP: obří osvětlené billboardy
  EN FP: a billboard in a field
  cz FP: billboard na poli
5449 | doorway (noun): the opening in a wall where a door is | loc: dveřní otvor
  EN TS: She is in the doorway at last.
  cz TS: Konečně stojí ve dveřním otvoru.
  EN FS: She is in the garden at last.
  cz FS: Konečně stojí na zahradě.
  EN TP: an open stone doorway
  cz TP: otevřený kamenný dveřní otvor
  EN FP: a doorway with a curtain
  cz FP: dveřní otvor se závěsem
5450 | device (noun): a thing invented for a particular purpose | loc: zařízení
  EN TS: Saving money: she is unplugging devices.
  cz TS: Šetří peníze: odpojuje zařízení ze zásuvky.
  EN FS: Saving money: she is plugging in devices.
  cz FS: Šetří peníze: zapojuje zařízení do zásuvky.
  EN TP: unplugging every device
  cz TP: odpojování všech zařízení
  EN FP: charging every device
  cz FP: nabíjení všech zařízení
5451 | injection (noun): medicine put into the body with a needle | loc: injekce
  EN TS: One injection, now he is Hulk!
  cz TS: Jedna injekce a je z něj Hulk!
  EN FS: One pill, now he is Hulk!
  cz FS: Jedna pilulka a je z něj Hulk!
  EN TP: an injection in the arm
  cz TP: injekce do ruky
  EN FP: an injection in the leg
  cz FP: injekce do nohy
5452 | peaceful (adjective): not disturbed by fighting or trouble | loc: klidný
  EN TS: A peaceful lake in the mist.
  cz TS: Klidné jezero v mlze.
  EN FS: A peaceful beach in the mist.
  cz FS: Klidná pláž v mlze.
  EN TP: a peaceful mountain lake
  cz TP: klidné horské jezero
  EN FP: a peaceful mountain village
  cz FP: klidná horská vesnice
5453 | vase (noun): a container you put flowers in | loc: váza
  EN TS: She is filling a blue vase.
  cz TS: Plní modrou vázu.
  EN FS: She is filling a red vase.
  cz FS: Plní červenou vázu.
  EN TP: putting flowers in a vase
  cz TP: dávání květin do vázy
  EN FP: breaking a flower vase
  cz FP: rozbití vázy na květiny
5454 | ink (noun): a liquid used for printing or writing | loc: inkoust
  EN TS: Ink is splashing all over the passport.
  cz TS: Inkoust stříká po celém pasu.
  EN FS: Water is splashing all over the passport.
  cz FS: Voda stříká po celém pasu.
  EN TP: black ink drops
  cz TP: kapky černého inkoustu
  EN FP: blue ink on fingers
  cz FP: modrý inkoust na prstech
5455 | approval (noun): the official act of approving something | loc: schválení
  EN TS: He got the approval!
  cz TS: Dostal schválení!
  EN FS: He got no approval!
  cz FS: Nedostal schválení!
  EN TP: approval for a passport
  cz TP: schválení pasu
  EN FP: approval from his parents
  cz FP: schválení od rodičů
5456 | permission (noun): approval that lets you do something | loc: povolení
  EN TS: He got permission.
  cz TS: Dostal povolení.
  EN FS: He got no permission.
  cz FS: Nedostal povolení.
  EN TP: permission to travel
  cz TP: povolení k cestě
  EN FP: permission to park
  cz FP: povolení k parkování
5457 | visitor (noun): someone who comes to visit you | loc: návštěvník
  EN TS: The visitors brought a cake.
  cz TS: Návštěvníci přinesli dort.
  EN FS: The visitors brought a dog.
  cz FS: Návštěvníci přinesli psa.
  EN TP: visitors with a cake
  cz TP: návštěvníci s dortem
  EN FP: visitors at a museum
  cz FP: návštěvníci v muzeu
5458 | vitamin (noun): a substance in food that keeps you healthy | loc: vitamin
  EN TS: The vitamin is fizzing like crazy!
  cz TS: Vitamin šumí jako šílený!
  EN FS: The milk is fizzing like crazy!
  cz FS: Mléko šumí jako šílené!
  EN TP: a fizzing vitamin tablet
  cz TP: šumivá vitaminová tableta
  EN FP: a melting vitamin gummy
  cz FP: tající vitaminový bonbon
5459 | lava (noun): melted rock that flows out of a volcano | loc: láva
  EN TS: Lava on every slope.
  cz TS: Láva na každém svahu.
  EN FS: Snow on every slope.
  cz FS: Sníh na každém svahu.
  EN TP: glowing streams of lava
  cz TP: zářící proudy lávy
  EN FP: lava in a lamp
  cz FP: láva v lampě
5460 | sickness (noun): when your body cannot function normally | loc: nevolnost
  EN TS: The teacups cause sickness!
  cz TS: Kolotoč s hrnky způsobuje nevolnost!
  EN FS: The big wheel causes sickness!
  cz FS: Ruské kolo způsobuje nevolnost!
  EN TP: sickness after a ride
  cz TP: nevolnost po jízdě
  EN FP: sickness on a ship
  cz FP: nevolnost na lodi
5461 | ballot (noun): a document listing the choices you vote for | loc: hlasovací lístek
  EN TS: Everyone is posting a ballot.
  cz TS: Všichni vhazují hlasovací lístek.
  EN FS: Everyone is posting a letter.
  cz FS: Všichni vhazují dopis.
  EN TP: posting a folded ballot
  cz TP: vhazování složeného hlasovacího lístku
  EN FP: reading a long ballot
  cz FP: čtení dlouhého hlasovacího lístku
5462 | democracy (noun): a system where citizens elect their leaders | loc: demokracie
  EN TS: Democracy in one plastic box.
  cz TS: Demokracie v jedné plastové krabici.
  EN FS: Democracy in one wooden box.
  cz FS: Demokracie v jedné dřevěné krabici.
  EN TP: democracy in action
  cz TP: demokracie v akci
  EN FP: democracy on television
  cz FP: demokracie v televizi
5463 | journal (noun): a daily written record of your experiences | loc: deník
  EN TS: He's journaling at sea. Vibes.
  cz TS: Píše deník na moři. Pohodička.
  EN FS: He's journaling in bed. Vibes.
  cz FS: Píše deník v posteli. Pohodička.
  EN TP: writing a travel journal
  cz TP: psaní cestovního deníku
  EN FP: reading a science journal
  cz FP: čtení vědeckého časopisu
5464 | slim (adjective): having a slender, thin body | loc: štíhlý
  EN TS: She is slim.
  cz TS: Je štíhlá.
  EN FS: He is slim.
  cz FS: Je štíhlý.
  EN TP: a slim woman in jeans
  cz TP: štíhlá žena v džínách
  EN FP: a slim woman in shorts
  cz FP: štíhlá žena v šortkách
5465 | waist (noun): the narrow middle of the body above the hips | loc: pas
  EN TS: Waist measured. Belt fitted.
  cz TS: Pas změřen. Opasek padne.
  EN FS: Arm measured. Belt fitted.
  cz FS: Paže změřena. Opasek padne.
  EN TP: measuring her waist
  cz TP: měření jejího pasu
  EN FP: an apron round her waist
  cz FP: zástěra kolem pasu
5466 | formal (adjective): following the established rules, like formal dress | loc: formální
  EN TS: The waiter looks very formal.
  cz TS: Číšník vypadá velmi formálně.
  EN FS: The waiter looks very casual.
  cz FS: Číšník vypadá velmi neformálně.
  EN TP: a formal waiter's uniform
  cz TP: formální uniforma číšníka
  EN FP: a formal letter of complaint
  cz FP: formální stížnost
5467 | awake (verb): to stop sleeping and open your eyes | loc: probudit se | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The boy is awaking in shock!
  cz TS: Kluk se probouzí v šoku!
  EN FS: The dog is awaking in shock!
  cz FS: Pes se probouzí v šoku!
  EN TP: awaking in a bunk bed
  cz TP: probouzení na palandě
  EN FP: awaking in a tent
  cz FP: probouzení ve stanu
5468 | sign (noun): a big board that shows advertisements | loc: značka | checker: word_missing? | translator note: "značka" wrong for an advertising sign; used reklamní poutač/reklama
  EN TS: The signs are glowing.
  cz TS: Reklamní poutače září.
  EN FS: The trees are glowing.
  cz FS: Stromy září.
  EN TP: huge glowing signs
  cz TP: obří zářící reklamy
  EN FP: a stop sign
  cz FP: značka stop
5469 | walker (noun): someone who walks for exercise or pleasure | loc: chodec
  EN TS: This walker did 10,000 steps!
  cz TS: Tenhle chodec dal 10 000 kroků!
  EN FS: This walker did 100 steps!
  cz FS: Tenhle chodec dal 100 kroků!
  EN TP: a walker with Nordic poles
  cz TP: chodec s trekovými holemi
  EN FP: a walker in the mountains
  cz FP: chodec v horách
5470 | downtown (noun): the busy central business area of a city | loc: centrum města
  EN TS: Fast walk downtown in a suit.
  cz TS: Rychlou chůzí do centra města v obleku.
  EN FS: Fast walk downtown in jeans.
  cz FS: Rychlou chůzí do centra města v džínách.
  EN TP: walking to work downtown
  cz TP: cesta do práce v centru města
  EN FP: a downtown rooftop bar
  cz FP: střešní bar v centru města
5471 | level (adjective): flat, with no part higher or lower | loc: vodorovný
  EN TS: The bubble says it's level.
  cz TS: Podle bublinky je to vodorovné.
  EN FS: The bubble says it's crooked.
  cz FS: Podle bublinky je to křivé.
  EN TP: a level picture frame
  cz TP: vodorovný rám obrazu
  EN FP: a level road
  cz FP: vodorovná silnice
5472 | bill (noun): a piece of paper money from a bank | loc: bankovka
  EN TS: The bills are falling out.
  cz TS: Bankovky vypadávají.
  EN FS: The keys are falling out.
  cz FS: Klíče vypadávají.
  EN TP: bills falling from a wallet
  cz TP: bankovky padající z peněženky
  EN FP: bills in a cash machine
  cz FP: bankovky v bankomatu
5473 | wealthy (adjective): having a lot of money and valuable things | loc: bohatý
  EN TS: A "wealthy" man with an empty wallet.
  cz TS: „Bohatý" muž s prázdnou peněženkou.
  EN FS: A "wealthy" man with a full wallet.
  cz FS: „Bohatý" muž s plnou peněženkou.
  EN TP: a not so wealthy man
  cz TP: ne tak úplně bohatý muž
  EN FP: a wealthy man's big house
  cz FP: velký dům bohatého muže
5474 | coin (noun): a flat metal piece used as money | loc: mince
  EN TS: He is sorting his coins.
  cz TS: Třídí své mince.
  EN FS: He is sorting his cards.
  cz FS: Třídí své karty.
  EN TP: coins from a purse
  cz TP: mince z peněženky
  EN FP: coins in a fountain
  cz FP: mince ve fontáně
5475 | tank (noun): an armored military vehicle | loc: tank
  EN TS: A tank is coming behind them!
  cz TS: Za nimi jede tank!
  EN FS: A horse is coming behind them!
  cz FS: Za nimi jede kůň!
  EN TP: a tank in the smoke
  cz TP: tank v kouři
  EN FP: a tank full of water
  cz FP: nádrž plná vody
5476 | debris (noun): the bits left when something is destroyed | loc: trosky
  EN TS: She is walking over debris.
  cz TS: Jde přes trosky.
  EN FS: She is walking over flowers.
  cz FS: Jde přes květiny.
  EN TP: walking through debris
  cz TP: chůze troskami
  EN FP: sweeping up the debris
  cz FP: zametání trosek
5477 | fort (noun): a strong defensive structure | loc: pevnost
  EN TS: Best snow fort battle ever.
  cz TS: Nejlepší bitva o sněhovou pevnost ever.
  EN FS: Best sand fort battle ever.
  cz FS: Nejlepší bitva o pískovou pevnost ever.
  EN TP: a fort made of snow
  cz TP: pevnost ze sněhu
  EN FP: a fort made of stone
  cz FP: pevnost z kamene
5478 | stuff (noun): objects of all kinds, not named | loc: věci
  EN TS: Her stuff is attacking her!
  cz TS: Její věci na ni útočí!
  EN FS: Her books are attacking her!
  cz FS: Její knížky na ni útočí!
  EN TP: stuff falling out
  cz TP: vypadávající věci
  EN FP: stuff under the bed
  cz FP: věci pod postelí
5479 | robe (noun): a long loose piece of clothing | loc: roucho | checker: word_missing? | translator note: "roucho" wrong for a satin robe; used župan
  EN TS: A robe and a "tiny" wardrobe.
  cz TS: Župan a „malinká" šatna.
  EN FS: A robe and a "tiny" kitchen.
  cz FS: Župan a „malinká" kuchyň.
  EN TP: a long satin robe
  cz TP: dlouhý saténový župan
  EN FP: a hotel spa robe
  cz FP: hotelový župan ze spa
5480 | task (noun): a piece of work you take on | loc: úkol
  EN TS: His task is a tower of plates.
  cz TS: Jeho úkol je věž z talířů.
  EN FS: His task is a tower of shoes.
  cz FS: Jeho úkol je věž z bot.
  EN TP: a hard kitchen task
  cz TP: těžký úkol v kuchyni
  EN FP: a task at the computer
  cz FP: úkol u počítače
5481 | pink (adjective): a light shade of red | loc: růžová
  EN TS: Pink hair, white shirt. Phew.
  cz TS: Růžové vlasy, bílá košile. Uf.
  EN FS: Pink hair, pink shirt. Phew.
  cz FS: Růžové vlasy, růžová košile. Uf.
  EN TP: long bright pink hair
  cz TP: dlouhé zářivě růžové vlasy
  EN FP: a pink washing machine
  cz FP: růžová pračka
5482 | bath (noun): when you soak and wash your body in a tub | loc: koupel
  EN TS: The dog is having a bath. Spa day!
  cz TS: Pes si dává koupel. Wellness den!
  EN FS: The cat is having a bath. Spa day!
  cz FS: Kočka si dává koupel. Wellness den!
  EN TP: a dog in a bath
  cz TP: pes v koupeli
  EN FP: a dog in a pool
  cz FP: pes v bazénu
5483 | scan (verb): to examine something closely | loc: zkoumat
  EN TS: She is scanning the beach. For who?
  cz TS: Zkoumá pláž. Koho asi hledá?
  EN FS: She is scanning the forest. For who?
  cz FS: Zkoumá les. Koho asi hledá?
  EN TP: scanning the shore
  cz TP: zkoumání pobřeží
  EN FP: scanning a barcode
  cz FP: skenování čárového kódu
5484 | gaze (verb): to look at something steadily for a long time | loc: upřeně hledět
  EN TS: They're gazing at fireworks.
  cz TS: Upřeně hledí na ohňostroj.
  EN FS: They're gazing at the sea.
  cz FS: Upřeně hledí na moře.
  EN TP: gazing at the sky
  cz TP: upřeně hledět na oblohu
  EN FP: gazing at the screen
  cz FP: upřeně hledět na obrazovku
5485 | watering can (noun): a container with a spout for watering plants | loc: konev
  EN TS: She is using a watering can.
  cz TS: Používá konev.
  EN FS: She is using a garden hose.
  cz FS: Používá zahradní hadici.
  EN TP: a green watering can
  cz TP: zelená konev
  EN FP: an empty watering can
  cz FP: prázdná konev
5486 | flowerpot (noun): a clay container that a plant grows in | loc: květináč
  EN TS: He is watering the flowerpot.
  cz TS: Zalévá květináč.
  EN FS: He is painting the flowerpot.
  cz FS: Natírá květináč.
  EN TP: a flowerpot on the windowsill
  cz TP: květináč na parapetu
  EN FP: a broken flowerpot
  cz FP: rozbitý květináč
5487 | surfing (noun): the sport of riding a surfboard on waves | loc: surfování
  EN TS: Surfing inside a wave is cool!
  cz TS: Surfování uvnitř vlny je pecka!
  EN FS: Diving inside a wave is cool!
  cz FS: Potápění uvnitř vlny je pecka!
  EN TP: surfing a giant wave
  cz TP: surfování na obří vlně
  EN FP: surfing the internet
  cz FP: surfování po internetu
5488 | farewell (noun): an expression of goodwill at parting | loc: rozloučení
  EN TS: This farewell is taking forever.
  cz TS: Tohle rozloučení trvá věčnost.
  EN FS: This welcome is taking forever.
  cz FS: Tohle přivítání trvá věčnost.
  EN TP: a farewell at the port
  cz TP: rozloučení v přístavu
  EN FP: a farewell at the airport
  cz FP: rozloučení na letišti
5489 | wear (verb): to be dressed in something | loc: nosit
  EN TS: She wears every coat so well.
  cz TS: Každý kabát nosí tak dobře.
  EN FS: She wears every suit so well.
  cz FS: Každý oblek nosí tak dobře.
  EN TP: wearing a feather hat
  cz TP: nosí klobouk s pery
  EN FP: wearing a straw hat
  cz FP: nosí slaměný klobouk
5490 | weed (noun): a plant that crowds out garden plants | loc: plevel
  EN TS: He pulled out a giant weed!
  cz TS: Vytrhl obří plevel!
  EN FS: He pulled out a giant carrot!
  cz FS: Vytrhl obří mrkev!
  EN TP: pulling out a weed
  cz TP: vytrhávání plevele
  EN FP: a weed in the pavement
  cz FP: plevel v chodníku
5491 | welcome (adjective): received with pleasure | loc: vítaný
  EN TS: He is so welcome here!
  cz TS: Je tu tak vítaný!
  EN FS: He is so lonely here!
  cz FS: Je tu tak osamělý!
  EN TP: a welcome guest
  cz TP: vítaný host
  EN FP: a welcome break from work
  cz FP: vítaná pauza od práce
5492 | spoke (noun): a bar joining a wheel's hub to its rim | loc: paprsek
  EN TS: The wheel has thin spokes.
  cz TS: Kolo má tenké paprsky.
  EN FS: The wheel has no spokes.
  cz FS: Kolo nemá žádné paprsky.
  EN TP: thin metal spokes
  cz TP: tenké kovové paprsky
  EN FP: thin wooden spokes
  cz FP: tenké dřevěné paprsky
5493 | hub (noun): the central part of a wheel, around the axle | loc: náboj
  EN TS: He loves every hub he sees.
  cz TS: Miluje každý náboj, který uvidí.
  EN FS: He loves every car he sees.
  cz FS: Miluje každé auto, které uvidí.
  EN TP: the hub of a wheel
  cz TP: náboj kola
  EN FP: the hub of a city
  cz FP: dopravní uzel města
5494 | disabled (adjective): having a condition that limits what you can do | loc: zdravotně postižený
  EN TS: A disabled man is rolling fast.
  cz TS: Zdravotně postižený muž jede rychle.
  EN FS: A disabled man is rolling slowly.
  cz FS: Zdravotně postižený muž jede pomalu.
  EN TP: a disabled wheelchair user
  cz TP: zdravotně postižený vozíčkář
  EN FP: a disabled man on crutches
  cz FP: zdravotně postižený muž o berlích
5495 | rumor (noun): a story passed around by word of mouth | loc: drb
  EN TS: A rumor in the library!
  cz TS: Drb v knihovně!
  EN FS: A rumor in the kitchen!
  cz FS: Drb v kuchyni!
  EN TP: passing on a rumor
  cz TP: předávání drbu
  EN FP: starting a rumor online
  cz FP: šíření drbu na internetu
5496 | adjust (verb): to alter something so that it is just right | loc: upravit
  EN TS: She is adjusting his tie.
  cz TS: Upravuje mu kravatu.
  EN FS: She is adjusting his hat.
  cz FS: Upravuje mu klobouk.
  EN TP: adjusting a tie knot
  cz TP: úprava uzlu kravaty
  EN FP: adjusting a watch
  cz FP: seřizování hodinek
5497 | candidate (noun): a politician running for public office | loc: kandidát
  EN TS: The candidate won!
  cz TS: Kandidát vyhrál!
  EN FS: The candidate lost!
  cz FS: Kandidát prohrál!
  EN TP: a winning candidate
  cz TP: vítězný kandidát
  EN FP: a losing candidate
  cz FP: poražený kandidát
5498 | window (noun): the glass opening in the side of a vehicle | loc: okno
  EN TS: Every window, a new view!
  cz TS: Každé okno, nový výhled!
  EN FS: Every door, a new view!
  cz FS: Každé dveře, nový výhled!
  EN TP: leaning out of a window
  cz TP: vyklánění z okna
  EN FP: cleaning a window
  cz FP: mytí okna
5499 | woman (noun): an adult female person | loc: žena
  EN TS: A woman in red is spinning.
  cz TS: Žena v červeném se točí.
  EN FS: A woman in red is jogging.
  cz FS: Žena v červeném běhá.
  EN TP: a woman watering her flowers
  cz TP: žena zalévá květiny
  EN FP: a woman buying flowers
  cz FP: žena kupuje květiny
5500 | timber (noun): wood cut and prepared for building | loc: řezivo
  EN TS: Fresh timber lies in a pile.
  cz TS: Čerstvé řezivo leží na hromadě.
  EN FS: Fresh timber lies in a truck.
  cz FS: Čerstvé řezivo leží na náklaďáku.
  EN TP: a pile of fresh timber
  cz TP: hromada čerstvého řeziva
  EN FP: a truck of fresh timber
  cz FP: náklaďák čerstvého řeziva
5501 | industry (noun): making goods and services to sell | loc: průmysl
  EN TS: He works in heavy industry.
  cz TS: Pracuje v těžkém průmyslu.
  EN FS: He works in a flower shop.
  cz FS: Pracuje v květinářství.
  EN TP: a heavy industry factory
  cz TP: továrna těžkého průmyslu
  EN FP: the tourist industry
  cz FP: turistický průmysl
5502 | storage (noun): the act of storing things somewhere | loc: skladování
  EN TS: Boxes are going into storage.
  cz TS: Krabice se chystají ke skladování.
  EN FS: Boxes are going into the bin.
  cz FS: Krabice se chystají do popelnice.
  EN TP: boxes for storage
  cz TP: krabice ke skladování
  EN FP: storage on a phone
  cz FP: úložiště v telefonu
5503 | position (noun): the way the body and limbs are arranged | loc: poloha
  EN TS: She is in plank position.
  cz TS: Je v poloze prkna.
  EN FS: She is in lotus position.
  cz FS: Je v lotosové poloze.
  EN TP: a high plank position
  cz TP: vysoká poloha prkna
  EN FP: a position in the company
  cz FP: pozice ve firmě
5504 | send (verb): to cause something to be taken to another place | loc: poslat | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is sending a letter.
  cz TS: Posílá dopis.
  EN FS: She is sending a parcel.
  cz FS: Posílá balík.
  EN TP: sending a handwritten letter
  cz TP: posílání ručně psaného dopisu
  EN FP: sending a text message
  cz FP: posílání SMS
5505 | film (noun): photographic material you take pictures on | loc: film
  EN TS: She is studying an X-ray film.
  cz TS: Studuje rentgenový film.
  EN FS: She is studying a paper map.
  cz FS: Studuje papírovou mapu.
  EN TP: an X-ray film
  cz TP: rentgenový film
  EN FP: a film at the cinema
  cz FP: film v kině
5506 | dance (noun): a party where people meet to dance | loc: taneční zábava
  EN TS: Literally everyone came to this dance.
  cz TS: Na tuhle taneční zábavu přišel doslova každý.
  EN FS: Literally nobody came to this dance.
  cz FS: Na tuhle taneční zábavu nepřišel doslova nikdo.
  EN TP: a street dance at sunset
  cz TP: pouliční taneční zábava při západu slunce
  EN FP: a dance class at school
  cz FP: taneční kurz ve škole
5507 | zoo (noun): a place where wild animals are kept to see | loc: zoo
  EN TS: He is having fun at the zoo.
  cz TS: V zoo se skvěle baví.
  EN FS: He is having fun at the beach.
  cz FS: Na pláži se skvěle baví.
  EN TP: a day at the zoo
  cz TP: den v zoo
  EN FP: a day at the farm
  cz FP: den na farmě
